
The Magician Within Lectures Transcripts
audo_enhanced_The Magician Within 02.mp3	[00:00:00.410] 
Well, welcome. On behalf of the CG Jung Institute and the jungian community of Chicago, both lay and analytical, let me say just a word about the significance of this night. For me, this is the beginning of the final series of audiotapes in what was imagined as a five set series looking at the archetypes of the masculine psyche. And I'll get to tell you in a little bit about how kind of od it is for me to realize that I'm working. The last thing I'm lecturing on this series is on the archetype of the magician, the magician within.

[00:01:08.950] 
And I will get to tell you a little bit about my early work in this topic. A little bit. It's just suffice to say at this point that about 17 years ago, I started doing this work on the psychology of the magician and the psychology of magic. And I'll go into that in some detail. And at that time, I did not start out to do any kind of psychology of masculinity.

[00:01:39.610] 
That wasn't what I was doing. I was doing work in the phenomenology, anthropology and psychology of occultism and esoteric religious forms as a research interest. It was related to psychotherapy I was doing at that time. But it's significant to me personally that here that I started out doing the psychology of magic, and I'm ending this series doing that. So I'll tell you a little more about that in a minute.

[00:02:17.700] 
But let me just talk about the wider project that this is a part of. For those of you that have not been here before or been familiar with my work for that 17 years, I've gradually begun to realize that the psychology of Jung is tremendously important, even more so than I had realized because of its focus on the deep structures of the human psyche. And what I've been trying to do in my work is to continue Jung's work on the collective unconscious and on what he called the objective psyche. There are many people today that do not do much work in deep structures of the psyche. They focus a lot more on ego psychology, on staying pretty close to just dream interpretation and other things.

[00:03:23.970] 
But if you look carefully at Jung's work, and I recommend to you that if you have not done this, that you look sometime very soon that you go to the institute, if you do not have the 20th volume, the index to Jung's collected works, and that you just breeze through the topics in the collected works, just looking through the index and look at the enormous amount of attention that Jung gave to the study of structures in the human psyche, which he came to call archetypes, based on researches into the history and phenomenology of mythology and ritual and religion.

[00:04:10.910] 
In my view, that's very central to Jung's work and to anyone who takes a Jungian, a Jungian point of view, as opposed to many other kinds of points of view you can take. In other words, Jung believed that when you were studying mythology, you weren't just doing this for antiquarian interest. You were doing this for clues into what makes the human being function in the way that the HumAN being functions. That this is empirical research in a sense, and it's research that may turn up important breakthroughs in our understanding of the PsYche. It was in that spirit that I started working on the archetype of the magician a long time ago.

[00:05:02.050] 
And that work led me to RealizAtion ThRough the example of John Perry and John Perry's work on the Lord of the four quarters. If you haven't read John Perry's book, Lord of the four quarters, myths to the royal father, I realized that if you study transformation processes, you will discover the centrality of the king in any process of renewal. And so I then started studying the king and then realized that every king in traditional cultures always is accompanied by knights or warriors, and that there's a clear division of labor, sort of almost a role theory that operates here in the human psyche, and then it's acted out in the social arena. And then by looking very closely at mythical narratives, you realize that there is another figure that always appears and another thing that happens, and that is the appearance of the lover. And in mythic stories, you get the initiation of the young man, young prince, Young ParSifal, young man in the Story IroN Hans or IRON JOhn, as Robert Blythe talked about it.

[00:06:43.490] 
And these stories often end with a sacred marriage. And so you study these things, as I have, and you begin to realize that there is a reason why there has been so much emphasis on what Jung called the quaternio, the presence and prevalence of fours in the psyche and in mythology.

[00:07:09.770] 
And essentially what I've been trying to do is to clarify, to discover, and to decode and clarify why so much emphasis on fours.

[00:07:24.750] 
It's been my opportunity to be able to finally get some sense about what those FOur are, what THose four things are, and all those quaternios. And let me recommend that before next week, if you can find a copy of Jung's volume ion a Ion, that you look in there at his diagrams on the structure of the self, because in those diagrams, he argues in a way that I will elaborate more later tonight. Very briefly, for those of you who've not been familiar with this, the way in which Jung intuited and argued that in his essay in there on the structure of the PsYche, that the PsYcHe has been represented by esoteric teachers throughout many centuries as an octahedron or a double QuatErnio, that is two pyramids end. So look at those diagrams before next week and you can think about them in light of this.

[00:08:43.350] 
It's my belief that these quaternios that people have emphasized from Navajo mythology to gnostic mythology are these four archetypal structures in the deep structures of the self, that they exist in the self, in the masculine self, and they exist in the feminine self. And we'll get into more detail in that a little bit. And what I've been doing in this tape series, and also in a series of books co authored with my friend and mythologist Douglas Gillette, is to do a book, an introductory book LayIng this Out, and a book on each of these archetypal structures which are to be seen together. Because once you begin to get a grasp of these things, you begin to realize that you cannot understand the human psyche by looking at one plane, one space. You have got to understand why there are four of these spaces in the human psyche.

[00:09:57.570] 
You have to understand what their particular contribution to the whole human personality is and what happens when one or more of them is undeveloped. Now, to anticipate myself, let me just say that it is the magician in you whose task it is to understand this and to get to the point that this magician within can help you access the spaces you need to access when you need to access them. You know, the New Testament has Jesus giving Peter the keys to the kingdom, and we all heard all that stuff about. In my father's house are many mansions. Well, in the masculine self are four spaces, and it's the magus who has the keys.

[00:11:02.050] 
So that's the course. You can go home now.

[00:11:07.110] 
But for those rest of you that have got a lot of this magician stuff in you, you just like to know all this stuff. Those of you I see out there with those platinum coated elephant shit shovels, they love to dig this meta theoretical stuff. So what you will notice is this magician business. See the magician, in a way, it's more fun to talk about the king because you get into all your grandiosity of being the king and all that sort of thing. Or you can talk about the warrior and get into all that hot Mars energy, or you can talk about the lover like we did the last time and get into play and display.

[00:11:58.310] 
And they're all extroverted. All of those structures are extroverted structures. This structure is introverted. This one isn't easy. This one requires more patience and more subtlety and nuance in terms of getting into what it's for.

[00:12:19.400] 
And I think one of the reasons that there's been so much mystification around the archetype of the magician is that people that are interested in this and do this know how short the attention span of all of us is. So they've got to try to impress us with all the mystification so we won't lose interest in what the magician does. And that's because it's technical and it's complicated and it's not racy. And so it's going to be a challenge to try to follow along with this. But let me begin by just giving you a little outline from Ian Butler.

[00:13:12.430] 
I was hoping that you would have access to this book by Ian Butler. An Oxford University press book in paperback entitled the myth of the magus. And they tried to get it for you, but it is out of print. You may be able to find this through a used bookstore or something. It is a fine book, and I would like you to see if you can find you a copy of that.

[00:13:34.760] 
You ought to try to grab them if you can find them. But let me start. Let me just lay out what I want to do tonight. This is hitting the high ground and running fast. I'm going to present Butler's ideas on the magus very briefly.

[00:13:57.370] 
Then I'm going to talk a little bit about my work and research on this, which has led me to differ from Butler and get a lot more specific in delineating what the archetype of the magician is and what it isn't. One of the things which we see in a lot of the older work in archetypal structures and myth is that there tends to be an inability to differentiate between structures that are clearly differentiated once you get to looking at them carefully. And Butler couldn't make some differentiations that we need to be able to make. And I will make some differentiations there. Then I want to present the structure of transformation, which is in the archetype of initiation, which is a part which goes with you.

[00:14:54.670] 
Remember Alan Watts always talking about things that go with other things? Well, there are three things that we have to get across to you tonight that go in the mythology of the magician. Three things that are held together in it. And if you don't get anything else. This is what you ought to get in terms of the assumptions about this tonight.

[00:15:23.430] 
When the archetype of the magician is constellated, three things happen, and this is in any person, and that person may not have any idea that the archetype of the magician has been constellated.

[00:15:39.950] 
Number one, you start looking for omegas, you become a quester, what I call a quester. Did you ever see the movie close encounters of the third kind? Well, in that, Roy Neary is this guy, just an ordinary fella and he's just living his life and he's got his kids and he's got his wife and he's got his pickup truck, and he's just living his life and he's going along, and all of a sudden he has an encounter with what Jung would call the numinous by means of a UFO almost landing on his pickup. Right after that point, Roy Neary's life is never the same again. He has become a quester.

[00:16:31.240] 
He is looking for the holy Grail. After that point, that's one thing that happens. You start on your quest, you may not have the slightest idea what you're looking for. What you are looking for is the magician. That is what is being looked for.

[00:16:52.870] 
Some people go through 20 or 30 cults looking for the real magician. Now, what I'm here to tell you tonight is the real one ain't out there, folks. It's in here. And part of your initiation is to discover that the real one ain't out there, but it's in here.

[00:17:16.570] 
The good, solid, working journeyman magicians out there will help you learn that. Okay? So that's the first thing. The second thing is whenever the archetype of the magician is constellated, immediately you are into this space right here. You are into this archetype of initiation.

[00:17:40.850] 
You get into that structure, all of your life becomes structured according to this archetype of initiation.

[00:17:49.830] 
If you have not seen the book that Murray Stein and I co edited called Jung's challenge to contemporary religion, this chart is printed in an elaborate way in the chapter I did in there called Ritual Initiation and contemporary religion, a much elaborated form of this chart and in my essay in there on initiation. But here's the point. Once that Archetype of the Magus is constellated and you become a quester, you are on this pilgrimage in this space, and you will be until you have run the course of this. And one of the things we'll do tonight is I'll talk a little bit about what happens when you find your magician and what happens when you don't. Okay, so that's two.

[00:18:42.310] 
The third thing that you need to understand is that a part of this archetype of initiation is a central assumption about the necessity for sacred transformative space. In other words, you can start out on your quest to find your magician. And you're not only looking for a magician, you're also looking for sacred geography. You're looking for the special place. You hear a lot of people in the new age now talk about power places.

[00:19:23.970] 
If you're going to go your vision quest, why can't you do your vision quest down the corner of Randolph in Michigan? Why do you have to go tomogamy? Well, because sacred geography is built in. You've got to try to find a sacred space. And what we need to do tonight, before you go, we've got to get you clear about, well, what is this sacred space business when it comes to the magician?

[00:19:49.790] 
Later, I'm going to point out that all of these spaces are sacred in some sense, but the sacred space that is unique to the magician in you is this transformative space here that we're talking about. And then after the break, and hopefully we'll move through all this fast so we can have plenty of time for questions and discussion, is that I will point out that the goal of this whole business, both in myth and today, is truly to get initiated into the esoteric knowledge. That's what everybody else knows, but I don't. But it is not just a one dimensional thing. That is to say, the real goal of initiation by your inner magician is, as I said a little earlier, is to get you able to move through the various spaces of inner geography at will, appropriately so.

[00:21:03.890] 
We'll try to get a sense of these different spaces very briefly, and you can refer to the other tapes in this series to get more elaborate discussions and roadmaps about those different spaces. But I'll try to give you a little once over lightly with that tonight before we go second session next week, I'm going to get much more deeply into what this circuit is for.

[00:21:33.710] 
That is to say, if a man, we're speaking of masculine psychology, and I'll stick pretty closely to that, but there's a parallel in the woman. If a man has this circuit online, what can he do that he can't do without it?

[00:21:56.150] 
What potential is actualized in him, cognitively, behaviorally, emotionally, et cetera, that he doesn't have without it? Third session, we're going to talk about what it looks like when this thing is not working correctly.

[00:22:20.590] 
One of the things that I've tried to do is help people realize that we don't all get crazy in the same way or in the same space in the psyche. And I want to describe a little bit about what it's like to be crazy in the megas state. In the state of megas, what it's like to be crazy there. As composed of what it's like as compared to what it's like to be, say, crazy in the warrior state. It's very different.

[00:22:51.350] 
Or crazy in the lover state. So that's my plan, if that's all right with you. Let me just stop there for a moment and see if you have any questions before I go into this butler stuff. Any comment or question? Yes, back here.

[00:23:07.370] 
Constellated. Yes. Constellated. What is that? Well, when a Youngian speaks of a particular archetypal configuration being constellated, it means organized in your psyche in such a way that it becomes a felt reality.

[00:23:26.290] 
And it functions in your psyche like a magnet. Functions with iron filings on a piece of paper. In other words, you take your piece of paper, you put the iron filings on it and shake it. And you don't put the magnet up there. It's not constellated.

[00:23:44.470] 
Put it up there underneath it. It organizes. That's constellating. What I'm here to say is that each one of these archetypes, when you put them up there under the sheet of paper, you don't get the same pattern. You don't get the same potential.

[00:24:03.790] 
You don't get the same emotions. You don't get the same craziness. You get different ones. And the important thing about studying these archetypal configurations is. I say it's not antiquarian.

[00:24:17.660] 
We study it because we need to have an operator's manual for the male psyche. And women can do the same thing for their own structures. But once you begin to get a feel for these different ways in which libido manifests itself through these archetypal structures, then you have a way to. Well, you don't have to wait around forever to figure out what's wrong with you.

[00:24:47.770] 
Before we get through with this course. And if you've had a chance to listen to some of these other tapes, you should be able to tell me if I gave you. In fact, we ought to do this. We ought to have a quiz. You ought to take a piece of paper, and I'll show you.

[00:25:06.470] 
Maybe in the third session, we'll draw out these four quadrants. And maybe you can do this for me. Maybe you can fill in shade in the places where you're developed, where you're accessing these particular archetypal energies and where you're not. And what's fascinating, I do this with people all the time. Okay.

[00:25:34.410] 
I'll say, okay, now draw me. Let's look at this. You draw me. Now, how are you on this king energy here? Okay, now, how are you on so forth?

[00:25:43.330] 
We go around, once you get that shaded in, you can see where the person's problems are and why. And it doesn't take you ten years to try to wait around to the right. Dream tells you. I mean, I'm all for dream interpretation, but I don't know if you're like some folks. Some folks wait a long time for brilliantly guiding dreams.

[00:26:09.750] 
So one of the things that we will try to do is have you kind of take a little map of inner coordinates and have you draw yourself a little bit. And then maybe you should write me a little bit about how it manifests. I'd love to have that, because I'm trying to figure out the way all these things. I'll share with you some of the things that I have discovered about the different patterns, how they manifest and why. And you will be able to see that if you don't know what the different spaces are in your psyche, you can get the idea that the only space that exists is magician space.

[00:26:55.430] 
And if you're very schizoid, in other words, if you tend to be lonely and detached and not go out a lot, tend to study a lot and read a lot.

[00:27:10.250] 
Now, you may not know that that's magician space that you're living in, but the worst thing is that you may not know that that's not the only one that's in there.

[00:27:21.390] 
And there are a lot of psychotherapists that go into psychotherapy because they can't figure out anything else to do because they live in the mega space all the time. And so they just do what comes natural.

[00:27:36.210] 
And the only love life they have is everybody else's.

[00:27:42.210] 
We'll talk more about that later. But let me get into think about that voyeurism, we call it.

[00:27:50.310] 
Okay? Butler was a professor at Cambridge University in England, and he tried in his work to bring all these features together of the myth of omegas as he saw it. Let me give you a quote, and you'll see the problems with the point of view of these early scholars. Quote the legendary magician derives from that dim and distant hero. Now, there's one archetype who, as king, that's another archetype, God or priest, died to be reborn in kingship or seasonal rights.

[00:28:38.310] 
And although he gradually became a creature, sealed and set apart in the magic circle, he was originally one of the countless dying gods whose distribution is worldwide. I get that. See? Now see, he conflates. See, he does with the magician what Joseph Campbell did with the hero.

[00:29:01.390] 
You kind of reduce a lot of the mythical figures to one archetypal form.

[00:29:11.390] 
And from his point of view, there were ten characteristics. Now listen to this now and see how it really does sound like dying, rising God or the messiah or any number. Those of you that were with me in the sacred king course, it sounds like kingship. He doesn't differentiate between the magician or Magus and the king. Okay, here's the outline.

[00:29:33.230] 
First, there's a supernatural or mysterious origin of the hero, which to him is the magus. This might be divine, could be demonic, but it's always strange and mysterious.

[00:29:55.870] 
Secondly, there were portents at his birth. They vouched for his supernatural powers, such as when Mohammed was born. And the story was that all of the idols of the world fell down when Muhammad was born. Third, he says the Magus is always periled in his infancy. Now this sound like the myth of the birth of the hero.

[00:30:33.050] 
Evil wishers or the power of evil always try to do the Magus in at birth.

[00:30:43.390] 
Fourth, there's always some kind of initiation which is described. It's a period of preparation modeled on initiation ceremonies. Now there's. Now he's got this right. He's got the tie between the magician and initiation.

[00:31:00.910] 
That's always true. And he has this correct. Austerities and temptations occur which are then either preceded or followed by number five far distant wanderings. Now get that wanderings business. Now let's look at this.

[00:31:23.550] 
Think about it archetypically. When initiated or during the course of initiation, the Magus wanders, sometimes to seek for wisdom, sometimes to spread wisdom. The voyage may be supernatural. It may include a descent into the underworld and or an ascent into heaven. Now think about the stories you know about this.

[00:31:50.040] 
Jesus did what? Well, allegedly went into the underworld.

[00:31:57.590] 
When we get to the shaman, the shaman, as a part of initiation, will go up into the netherworld, go up, go up the ladder, go up, climb the tree and go up into the other world. You get this sense that the shaman is the one who goes to the center, the tree at the center of the world. I've got over here and either climbs down it or up it. But clearly the magician is the one who has found the tree, right? Found the ladder.

[00:32:31.880] 
That person knows where the ladder is and is not afraid to climb on it. I think you ought to also notice the way in which this wandering business, you get all these know, the esoteric stories, the gnostic Jesus, and the idea, well, Jesus went over into India and studied with sages over there. You get other stories that Jesus went into the know. Everybody knows that in those himalayan mountains, there's a secret chamber where you go to be initiated, shangri la. But look at that fantasy.

[00:33:17.630] 
You're not limited to one space. Get that? See, I think he's right about that. This thing in the psyche is not limited to one space. It knows the other spaces.

[00:33:35.430] 
So I think he's right. Six. For the magus, there's always a magical contest.

[00:33:46.970] 
According to Butler, this is an outstanding and constant feature in the lives of all magicians, whether legendary or real.

[00:34:01.540] 
And he gives a lot of different examples about the, for example, in the biblical tradition, the contest between Elisha and the prophets of Baal. And there are many other examples of whose magic is stronger, the wicked sorcerer or the true magus. And you get these throughout world traditions. Now, we'll need to be asking ourselves a little later what that is about, because what you will have to do is to get a sense about the development of the magician in you, because at a very immature level of development, this archetype is not interested in fighting anything. It's not interested in changing anything.

[00:34:55.480] 
It just wants to understand it.

[00:34:59.960] 
This is the part of us that when we're working on some social issue, we form a commission to study it. We want to study it. We don't get around to doing anything about it, but we want to study it. That's the lower level of development of the magus. But you hear in this, the magus, when fully initiated, is willing to take something on.

[00:35:30.100] 
And that's where we get to the shaman, because the shaman. The reason the shaman is highlighted as being so important today, and I think it's legitimate, is that the shaman is the highest developed form of the magus. And as we will see a little later, the shaman integrates the virtues of all of these different sides of the male psyche.

[00:36:02.860] 
And you can see this a little bit talked about in a story, in the storytelling of Castaneda, how the shaman has the capacity to care that comes out of the king. He has the capacity to fight, which comes out of the warrior and the capacity to value somebody else enough to fight for them comes out of the lover, et cetera.

[00:36:38.760] 
When we're talking about the range of development of the magician, we're talking about a range, and we'll try to talk about this a little bit later. That ranges from the trickster to the shaman, because the trickster is in this magician space.

[00:36:59.920] 
And at the apex of the mature development of it, it's the shaman, the one who is a developed and mature healer.

[00:37:11.940] 
Okay. Butler says, number seven, there's almost always a trial or a persecution.

[00:37:26.100] 
And eight, there's almost always a last scene. Think last supper, which often embodies a solemn and prophetic farewell.

[00:37:41.580] 
Nine, there is almost always a violent or mysterious death. And ten, a resurrection or ascension of some kind.

[00:38:00.440] 
Now, it's interesting to think about this in the light of the possible meanings of these things, just in the light of the magician archetype. That is to say, why a trial or persecution? Well, you see, here's the thing. Why do you think denial is so popular with humans? You know, we human beings are virtuosos at denial.

[00:38:28.980] 
Why is that? Well, it's because you start understanding something, life is going to get dangerous for you. Think about it. Think about how carefully people do not know the things that if they knew, they would have to get involved.

[00:38:49.960] 
So you can really see behind this business of the trial or persecution that the initiated magician is somebody who knows too much. And when you know too much, you're likely to get persecuted, especially if you're mature enough to try to do anything about anything. Yes, back here. The comment he's saying is that there's a good tape in the institute library about the scapegoating phenomenon in which the magician is scapegoated by a community in order to not deal with its issues or what we Jungians would call the shadow side of the community, the collective.

[00:39:33.480] 
It's very interesting to think about Jesus in this respect and the Jesus of the gospels, because he's presented as someone who knows a lot and who reveals a lot and is skilled for his efforts.

[00:39:52.540] 
And one of the things you'll want to think about is this last scene. I mean, why is this? It's sort of a resignation motif. The magus comes up, sees what he sees, starts to reveal it, comes under attack with mighty forces against him, says his goodbyes and is killed.

[00:40:28.680] 
There's always this last little motif that is a vindication of some sort at the end. That is, it's awfully hard to kill, this being you can think about that in an archetypal sense in that finally, you can't kill this thing because it's in the hardwiring of every person and it's going to be back.

[00:40:57.360] 
But it's also interesting in the light of the total structure of the psyche, that if all you've got is magician energy, you're going to lose.

[00:41:10.760] 
Think about that a second. See? I mean, if all you can do is to study and understand the problems and you don't have any warrior firepower, you're not going to win over the problems. So I think it's interesting the way in which Butler picks up on the kind of inherent problems of this archetypal configuration. When taken by itself, it sees a lot more than it can do anything about.

[00:41:45.600] 
Get it? See, it's the college professor.

[00:41:54.580] 
Okay, so Butler sees some very important things he understands. First of all, for example, he notes that erotic love does not make the magician's world go round. Boy, that's the understatement of the year, because the magician is the most detached of all these archetypal configurations. And the more of this you've got, the more problems you're probably going to have getting in relationship.

[00:42:33.280] 
It's just that you've got so many interesting things to study, books about relationship.

[00:42:42.500] 
If you've got a lot of magician in you, you've got a whole shelf full of books about relationships, about that.

[00:42:54.920] 
So he sees that, but he doesn't really do much with it. He doesn't have any way of telling us about why that is the case, just that it is the case. The magus does its thing, and it's not got much to do with love.

[00:43:16.880] 
He emphasizes their charismatic qualities, which is certainly true.

[00:43:24.560] 
And yet we know today that anybody who is mainlining any of these archetypal patterns, king, warrior, magician, lover, you will have charisma to the extent that you're mediating archetypal energy through one of these configurations. So it's not surprising that this person would have charisma.

[00:43:55.180] 
Now, his greatest contribution lies in his recognition of two things, two things that he saw that I think are really accurate. First, that the image of the magus, the magician is the primary image behind the varieties of cultural expressions of ritual healers, that this is the archetypal image that is behind the shaman, the wizard, the medicine man, the bruge, et cetera. In other words, there is no archetype of the shaman. The shaman is an expression of this archetype of the magician, that the archetype of magician is the fundamental archetypal structure that different cultures clothe with different forms. And that, for example, priest and prophet and old wise man.

[00:45:00.320] 
You know, Jung talks about the old wise man. You'd often see talking about archetype of the old wise man. Well, you can be an old wise man without being a.

[00:45:13.940] 
So it's important, Butler's contribution to get us clear about what the fundamental archetype behind witch doctors and et know warlocks and so forth is the archetype of the magician. And that is a great contribution.

[00:45:29.800] 
Secondly, he saw that the magician is always associated with initiatory process, with initiation, and that he is associated with the special space associated with healing rituals.

[00:45:48.720] 
So that is the most important contribution of his work. The most serious limitation is that he tended to conflate or kind of run together the archetypal images of hero, king and magician, which in my view are clearly radically distinct. They are not the same and should not be conflated. Hopefully soon you can get a chance to look at his book. It's a classic in the field.

[00:46:23.900] 
With those introductory remarks, you should be able to really look at his discussion of a lot of different traditional magician figures and get a sense of some of the narratives about magicians throughout history. That's what he emphasizes. The question is to speak to initiation and what that means. I'm going to get into that now because that's what I really discovered in the course of my own field work. So let me just do it that way.

[00:46:58.770] 
Back in 73, I was doing therapy with a lot of people that had been involved in the occult and cult groups and decided that I would do some studies of my own to try to investigate what's going on in occult groups to understand some of the psychological implications of it.

[00:47:21.420] 
At that time I was of the opinion that probably all these occult groups and so called cult groups were very bad for one's mental health. They made you crazy, et cetera, et cetera, and kind of a typical anti cultist point of view. And then I started doing field work. And from 1973 to 1983 I did extensive ethnographic field studies of magical practice and occult practice and the cult phenomenon in the United States. And I did thousands of hours on site interviewing, spending a lot of time with different people, different practitioners of different traditions.

[00:48:04.040] 
And let me just give you a couple of references on that sort of thing that you can look at. If you want to know something about the varieties of the occult experience in this country, try to get a hold of the second volume of Gordon Melton's Encyclopedia of American Religions, in which he has laid out the varieties of different occult traditions. Gordon Melton is one of the researchers that I ran into when I was trying to do this study of the psychology of the occult. Somebody said, well, you ought to meet Gordon Melton before you finish this book. And after I met Gordon, I realized it was going to be years before I'd be able to finish this book because he had forgotten more than I had learned about this.

[00:48:52.410] 
Gordon Melton is probably the world's foremost scholar in the field of small religions in general and the occult in particular. So that one reference is important. The other thing he did a bibliography on neo paganism. There's a bibliography, Gale Research Press bibliography on neo paganism, which is a book length bibliography on work on magic in the United States. I don't know whether you're aware of this, but neo paganism is the fastest growing form of religion in America today.

[00:49:33.240] 
And it is widely practiced right here in river City. And anybody that studies this stuff a very brief time can find a witch or a ritual magician in a very brief period of time. Well, it's someone who practices ritual magic, which. Not a stage magician, someone who actually practices ritual magic. And that's what I was doing, going from group to group, being present in situations where people were taking the role of the magician and leading ritual process of various kinds and toward various ends.

[00:50:19.610] 
I mean, you begin to realize that that's the amazing thing. When you first realize, you mean to say that there really are people that practice this stuff. Not only are there people that practice this stuff, they get together in great gatherings across the country. I remember the first time I ever went to a pan pagan festival. Now think about this.

[00:50:40.690] 
A pan pagan festival. That's where all the different people practicing and all these different ritual occult traditions get together and kind of share their wares and stories and insights and so forth. And some of them even have a. You know, they have little Sunday schools for little pagans.

[00:51:02.820] 
The first time I ever saw a little skit for little pagans, it really got to me. I thought, wow, they didn't know about this. Back down the baptist circles in Texas.

[00:51:16.920] 
I remember one time, remind me sometime off the record, to tell you about the time that I was down in the north Georgia mountains with a bunch of witches riding around and these witches were in their ritual robes. And I kept thinking about, well, what if those Georgia state patrol stop us? And then I realized, well, they'll just think that we're all the clan.

[00:51:43.420] 
But I'm not kidding, that actually happened. But anyway, so what I began to realize for our purposes tonight is underneath there's a commonalty to all of these people that practice ritual magic. And the first commonalty you will see is that they all have a theory of initiatory process. They think initiation, no matter what school they're in. And there are many, many different schools of occultism and magic, but all of them think initiation, stages of initiation, initiatory process, and degrees of initiation.

[00:52:27.840] 
And that roughly translates out for those of you that are interested in developmental psychology as really kind of stages of development. You think about moral development theories or theories of cognitive development. Well, these are parallel to what these people in these esoteric traditions talk about as initiation. Different initiations. They are theories that have to do with maturation and growth in powers in different aspects of the psyche.

[00:53:00.120] 
And it sounds very spooky, but when you sit down with a group of practicing magicians, first thing you ask around, they know you're there studying them, but typically pretty friendly folk, and sit you down, and then you ask around, you find out most of them are social workers.

[00:53:29.220] 
And when they're talking about magic, what they're talking about is all these techniques they have to help people realize their various potentials and powers to actualize them at work. And you begin to realize, say, hey, this sounds familiar. I mean, it's a little bit like pastoral counseling. And. And you begin to realize that these are Different Languages.

[00:53:57.540] 
These are traditional languages which have to do with spiritual growth, spiritual and psychological growth. And so all of these different schools have their own language that have to do with different stages of psychological and spiritual growth. And they come with different myths, different stories and symbols through which they interpret them. But, you know, if you get to know one of my Witch friends and you go with her to her meetings with her followers, and you listen carefully, you will see them working very systematically in a fairly coherent system of symbols and mythology and working on developmental problems that would parallel what a Jungian would talk about as individuation.

[00:54:57.760] 
And so what you begin to realize is that if you're there as a researcher studying it, you begin to say, isn't it interesting that all of these different people from all of these different magical traditions, that some of which are just totally. They're just unrelated to each other, but they're all working with this pattern of initiation. They all have got this pattern of initiation, and it parallels what Arnold van Gannep talked about in the book, the Rites of passage.

[00:55:29.720] 
And so that led me to begin to study ritual process. And it was about that time that I discovered the work of Victor Turner, the great anthropologist, great cultural anthropologist, had started his studies in african ritual and generalized them and became, before his untimely death, the most outstanding anthropological researcher in ritual of our time. And that's one of the things that part of my pilgrimage, realizing the importance to study ritual process, to get at this whole business about initiation, to get some sense of what is going on here. And a little later tonight, we'll talk just briefly about Turner's work. But if you're going to understand ritual, the magician, and what all this business is about for human life, then you need to get into Victor Turner's work.

[00:56:28.220] 
And you want to start with his book, the Ritual Process, which is a Cornell University press book. And before we go tonight, I'm just going to lay out for you two of his terms, liminality and lemonoid, and tell you a little bit about what that means. And when we get into the psychopathology session, two weeks, two weeks from the night, we'll get more into that. But anyway, so I began to realize you had to study this ritual process to understand what these people were doing. What I began to realize is that these people were serving as ritual elders, trying to use ritual processes for healing and guidance and maturation, and that is indeed what they see themselves as doing.

[00:57:28.240] 
Then I began to use anthropology to study psychotherapy. And I began to realize that unlike what the Freudians had told me, you know, Freudians will tell you that all ritualization is neurotic, and anybody that does ritualization is neurotic, and all ritual is really a sign of psychopathology. I began to realize, really, that freudian analysts were ritual elders and that they were using ritual leadership to try to help people deal with their maturation and their personal growth. They were creating these special spaces. They call it transference, the transference field.

[00:58:16.720] 
And so you can look at the issue of Zygon, the Journal of Religion and Science, which I edited, and look at the essay on psychotherapy as ritual process, which I wrote back in 83. I was one of the first psychoanalytic researchers that just came right out and said, come on, folks, let's just admit it all psychotherapy is ritual process. All psychotherapists are ritual leaders. And it would be a lot more honest if they would admit it and then use some anthropological perspectives so that they would not think they're so unique. And now we've come.

[00:58:59.810] 
That's been about seven years now. We're still kind of primitive about this, but we have come. There's a lot more work being done on this. Now I have a book length manuscript that will be sort of a technical manuscript that should be published within a year on the magician and the analyst, sacred space, psychotherapy and healing. And Murray Stein is editing a Chiron press book on liminality and transitional phenomena in analysis, which is outgrowth of this kind of dialog between psychoanalysis and ritual.

[00:59:37.230] 
But the point is that when you get into studying this stuff, when you study the magician, you always find an awareness of initiation and awareness of the necessity of transformative space that is set apart from ordinary space. So in my work, what I've tried to do is to lift up the fact that this always rises together. See, if you look at Iliadi, Iliadi understands sacred space. If you look at Turner, Turner, Victor Turner understands sacred space. And originally, when I started writing about this, I thought that they were the ones that understood that the ritual elder was necessary.

[01:00:26.380] 
But I realized later that that came from my observation of these magicians. And where we have to correct Iliadi and Victor Turner on this stuff is to understand that anytime you get the magician, you get initiation and sacred space. Those three things are part of this magician archetype. They go together. They're never separate.

[01:00:53.760] 
Anytime you get the magician archetype, you get transformative space, and you get a concept of initiation. So what is our task together in understanding this stuff? Well, tonight is just to get you a sense of the phenomena of this. But before we get through, we need to understand what that's about in the hard wiring. I mean, why is this stuff in the hard wiring?

[01:01:22.220] 
What is there about the human male and human female, too, for that matter? But what is there about the human psyche, the male psyche that has got this circuit that is programmed for magician initiation, sacred space, and what that's there for. And it's our job during this four weeks to get clear about that. Let me just stop for a moment and see if there's any questions about that before we take our break. Yes, in a way, in my view, good psychotherapy is initiatory.

[01:02:02.840] 
Why? Because if you have a concept of initiation, you have a concept of maturity. Think about this.

[01:02:15.660] 
Initiation and maturity are concepts that go together. You don't have the concept of initiation without some concept of human maturity. What has happened in our time is that we think we can have psychotherapy without a conception of human maturity, a clearly articulated conception of human maturity. It's very difficult to get people to talk about maturity today. It's not impossible, but it's hard to do because it sounds kind of arrogant.

[01:02:52.530] 
You're going to talk about human maturity. We have.

[01:02:57.160] 
But in my personal view, it's time for us to talk about human maturity. In fact, it's kind of late for us to be talking about it. And psychotherapy ought to be addressing the issue Upfront. Upfront concept of what is human maturity. And psychology should face the fact that it's not Value Free, because if you got a value free psychology, what you've got is a trickster magus.

[01:03:39.460] 
It's a good place to stop. We'll come back there. Let's take about ten minutes for our break and come back and we'll get in deeper.

[01:03:50.680] 
We'll have a chance to circumambulate this material and spiral back through it a number of times during our course. But I want to get these two charts, get through those as quickly as possible, and so we can have some time for discussion.

[01:04:12.560] 
The first one here is really quite simple. All you got to realize is that in human history, you can find this thing everywhere and read it from left to right. The movement of human pilgrimages from left to right, here and here you have in the first phase, that's the phase before the tear in your perceptual world occurs. This is before your divorce, or this is before your illness, or this is before some other loss, but it works the other way around, too. It's before you got successful.

[01:05:07.040] 
And anytime the world kind of looks kind of domesticated over there, it looks like you can handle it, right? Kind of got it under control. The compulsive paradise over here on the left.

[01:05:25.160] 
And then all of a sudden, something happens, and there is a tear in the seamless garment of your consciousness. And it suddenly dawns on you that what had seemed so certain was not certain at all. You just thought it was. And all of those things that you thought you could assume, you can't assume. And you begin to strip away pieces of this cosmic egg, you begin to strip away pieces of it, and it all comes down.

[01:05:57.680] 
Peter Berger, the great sociologist, if you haven't been familiar with his work, he's somebody you ought to know. His books called the sacred Canopy, another one called the rumor of angels. A lot of stuff, the homeless mind. It's a great discussion of what has happened to us in the modern world when all of our mythic world fell in on us.

[01:06:31.580] 
That's kind of what has happened. See, to the individual here, they had a world which was, it seemed, integrated. Something tears it. Some event, some crisis, some catastrophe. It can be your adolescence or your midlife or your retirement.

[01:06:49.120] 
Whatever. We used to think that adolescents were the ones that had it. That's what van Gannop the rite of passage, adolescence, puberty. And then as we got a little more sophisticated in developmental psychology, we realized it happens again and again and again. And then you get the book seasons of a man's life.

[01:07:09.310] 
If you guys have not, and you ladies, too, if you haven't read seasons of a man's life by Daniel Levinson, you should read that to get some sense of developmental patterns and predictable crises in our society in a man's life. But each time you hit ONE of ThosE crises, you go over this first Threshold. That is what they like to talk about in ritual studies as stripping. You can talk ABout it as ritual humiliation.

[01:07:45.540] 
That's sort of dismemBerment, and it comes in all sorts of forms. This is where your first ordeals know you get the call in the book hero with a thousand faces, CAMPBELL is great on laying this Out. SEe, the hero with a thousand faces is just a mythological representation of this journey. In fact, that book could also be called the initiation journey.

[01:08:21.100] 
The hero. One of the things I like to say to people is a lot of people think the hero and the warrior are the same Thing. They are not at all the same Thing.

[01:08:31.300] 
You have a hero task, and that's to grow up. Once you grow up, then you become a warrior, and it's a radically different business. But the hero task is important. CAMPBELL's right about that and is the initiatory tasK. It's to triumph over one's own grandiosity.

[01:08:53.240] 
You got to kill a great giant. In a lot of the patriarchal myths, they like to present it that the boy has to kill, or that the young male hero has to kill this great female dragon. See, that's wrong. Male has to kill the great male dragon. His Own grandiosity.

[01:09:19.980] 
See, when we talk about in the men's movement today, when we talk about initiation, we're talking about sort of a ritual initiatory death of the boy in the ego.

[01:09:36.520] 
And men all over the CounTry are addressing this issue of how do you do that? How do you get the boy out of control of your life so that you can assume your responsibilities as a man? Well, that's the initiatory task for a man. There's a parallel one for a woman. But anyway, what is happening when you go over this first threshold is that you're really coming to terms with the fact that there are forces a lot larger than you thought.

[01:10:15.220] 
There's a great little movie that dramatizes this in a cartoon like way called Dragon Slayer. You seen that? You ought to look at Dragon SlAyEr this week. See, that's a good little cartoon story about this, because the young male, he's a hero, and there's this dragon that's been eaten virgins right and left.

[01:10:46.060] 
And so he decides he's going to go down there into this cave, and he's going to kill this dragon. So he gets his sword out and he goes down into the cave, and that's kind of going over the threshold. When he goes down into the cave, that's over the threshold, and he gets down here in the cave, and it's a wonderful dragon cave. It's got all these fires burning in the water and the bubbling. And so he's going around, walking over these rocks, and he's looking for this dragon.

[01:11:14.160] 
And you can just tell by looking at his face, he thinks, well, the dragon knew I was coming, and he left.

[01:11:21.640] 
He knew I was coming and he left. And right over, we can see over his shoulder. See? And we can see right over his shoulder, there's this head that starts coming up out of the water, and the head of this thing is bigger than he is.

[01:11:39.360] 
That's what happens in initiation, because what you're doing is you're realizing that the forces you're dealing with are a hell of a lot bigger than you thought. And what they didn't teach you in childhood was that this isn't going to be easy.

[01:11:58.500] 
ANd the rest of that movie is what that young boy has to do in terms of finding his magus, who can introduce him to the power that can make him equal to this beast. That's a pretty good statement about all this. So if you just look at that dragon SlAyER this week, you'll get a good mythic statement about this stuff. Okay? Joseph Campbell's great about laying this thing about the night sea journey.

[01:12:32.040] 
This is the belly of the whale, the belly of the beast. The central part here. This is the sacred space. Supposed to be, anyway. The real question in initiation is, do you get cooked or not?

[01:12:49.940] 
That is, do you get containment? There's an issue, big issue, containment.

[01:12:58.040] 
What does a magician do for people? What does your inner magician do for you? If it's working right, it sees to it that you get adequate containment when you need it. That is to say, it helps you find the right space and the right vessel in order that you can do the work you need to do so that you can use that work to prepare you for another task that's coming down the road a little bit later. So, look, what I got here is, in case you can't tell what this is, that's fire, right?

[01:13:45.130] 
That's heat. That's the heat. This is the pressure cooker. You got to turn it up just right.

[01:13:55.180] 
And you don't want to stay in there too long.

[01:14:00.300] 
If you stay in therapy too long, something's wrong and you don't want to stay in there too short. See, if the therapist magus is not good enough about this stuff and doesn't understand about boundaries, they may let you out of there before you're done.

[01:14:22.500] 
Oh, yeah, there's nothing wrong with you. You took care of that symptom. We did a little be mod with you.

[01:14:34.600] 
I'm not going to talk about that. What I really think about that. See this word here? This is a Victor Turner word. Lemonoid and lemonade.

[01:14:45.920] 
Lemonade. L-I-M-I-N-A-L. That is Turner's word for adequately contained. That is to say, if you're in a change process and you have adequate containment, then the change process you're in would likely be successful. If you cannot find adequate containment, that is to say, you get in one of your midlife cris, you just decide to go to Vegas.

[01:15:13.220] 
Well, now, that's kind of containment in a way.

[01:15:18.100] 
If you ever drive up over that mountain outside of Las Vegas at night, you'll see that it's sort of containment. I mean, it is obviously special space. It's glimmering, glistening. And the gods and goddesses obviously do come out at night there. You can see them all over the place.

[01:15:47.580] 
Got to think about that. You got to think about that. You all slow tonight anyway. But the key to thing, the distinction in my mind between what, something that's liminoid, that is, it looks like it's going to change you. It's really play.

[01:16:05.140] 
And liminal, which is truly transformative space, is whether or not you have a knowledgeable ritual elder who is overseeing the process.

[01:16:19.160] 
Now, this is an argument that people have today.

[01:16:25.740] 
There are a lot of people that think that your archetypal self is just going to initiate you by itself. All you have to do is just smoke a little dope out on an island by yourself, and the archetypal self is going to come down there and give you your vision, and all of a sudden you're going to be initiated and get on with it. Well, I don't rule that out totally, but I have met so many shamans that got initiated that way. Do you ever meet some of those? All these people come up to you saying I'm a shaman.

[01:17:15.990] 
I got initiated on my vision quest, blah, blah, blah, blah. And you can see the archetypal glow.

[01:17:27.180] 
And you can tell that they're a mona personality like Jung talked about in the collected words. That is a little step beyond the borderline with a psychotic break.


audo_enhanced_The Magician Within 03.mp3
	[00:00:00.350] 
The point of it is that what Jung knew that a lot of Jungians don't, especially a lot of people haven't studied it much, is that the archetypal self is extremely powerful and is not always friendly and would love to have your body completely. He would love to move you out, move your ego out of your body and take it over so it can be Jesus or Muhammad or somebody else, some God or goddess or demon or something, and lets you go. The human you is gone. That happens a lot on uncontained initiations. I have spent a lot of time walking around the Malibu Mountains with a cultist that were the world saviors. You can always... The archetypal energy glows and you can just see it. You've heard of charisma. When you're really mainlining all this stuff, you can just see it glow. The person, one of the things you can always tell is they expect you to worship at the shrine. All this is to say, we can get into it a lot as we go, we'll get into more next two weeks from the night about psychopathology. Paranoid schizophrenia is a psychopathology of the magician.

[00:01:34.060] 
But the point of it is this. While it may be so that the archetypal self will initiate you and bring you to your planetary vocation by itself without any containment, I don't recommend that you try it that way. The human wisdom throughout the centuries is that when you're in a time of great dissolution in your life and disorientation and confusion, that you seek out knowledgeable ritual elders, and you seek out carefully laid out containment so that you can engage these things that are trying to become known by you, but you can engage them with people that will help you contain things while you can't. And that is the issue of ritual leadership. Among the old peoples of the earth, from the Australian Aborigines to the native Hawaiian, to the native Americans, they all knew this stuff. One of the reasons why there's so much interest in native American traditions today in all these Aboriginal traditions is precisely this, because they understood about the necessity for ritual elders in maturation processes.

[00:02:59.390] 
This is why there's always interest in shamanism today, because we intuitive that shamans are important when you're in a period in which you need guidance and you need to die a little bit in order that you be reborn to a larger vocation and larger personality.

[00:03:23.910] 
See, one of the things we'll get into a little later is that if you get into one of these initiatory phases in your life, like your midlife crisis or your divorce or whatever, and you don't recognize it as potentially initiatory, then you can become less of a person after it than you were when you went into it. You know what I mean? It can cripple you, in other words. While human beings throughout history have realized that there's a potential there, that if you get the right containment and the right help during those times, you can be much larger as a person after it than you were before. There's the critical issue. Does one become more whole, more powerful, with a deeper sense of meaning and a wider sense of personal and public vocation through these crises or not? It's my personal view that it's possible that that be the case. It's my personal view that that's what, in fact, should be the case when these things occur. If we continue to develop more ritual leadership among men and women, more knowledge about how to help people get through these things, we'll do a much better job at helping people literally grow more mature and more powerful through these crises.

[00:04:51.350] 
Let me stop there. Do you see this now? This is the center. This is that pressure cooker of transformative space and time. It's also time. It's not just space.

[00:05:02.400] 
It's what the Greeks call kairos, special time, pregnant time, not just kronos, which is ordinary time.

[00:05:14.770] 
If you get the containment you need and the leadership, the ritual elders that you need, and they will help you when you're ready, they will help you come back out to the world again over the second threshold. Campbell, quite rightly, points out how hard that is. Campbell points out that a lot of people never come over the second threshold. Why is that? If you know, contemporary psychoanalytic theory, it's easy to understand why. Because when you're in there, you're in touch with all that grandiose archetypal energy. When you're in there in that space, it may not feel all good, but you're in touch with all that special energy. When you come back to the world, you have to get used to people that don't worship you again. You say, To hell with this, I'm going back to Eslin. Think about that. I'm going to go do another workshop. What the hell? Somebody had to hand it back. Yeah. You said before What about the priests and the prophet are not necessarily magicians or ritual elders. I say that all of those things come under this particular archetype. Remember, archetype? See, a lot of people today that talk about The psyche and everything, they've got all sorts of things being archetypes that are not archetypes, in my view.

[00:06:51.650] 
For example, we hear people talk about the archetype of the hunter. In my view, the hunter is not an archetype at all. The hunter is an archetype like a stockbroker is an archetype. Once you understand that it is the archetype of the king who is the creator and provider and builder, and that in active modes, the thing you see is the king in the active modes, integrating the warrior stuff, builds things. You will see, for example, in Egyptian iconography and paintings, the king is represented as being the one who digs the dishes. He's the one who builds the buildings. He's the one who provides and builds. A hunter is a combination of a king warrior stuff. It is an individual who provides It's through the technology and mores of the particular cultural form. So anytime one's into providing, it's that. The same thing is true about the The Prophet, for example. The prophet, like the Shaman, is a pretty advanced form of this stuff because the prophet combines a lot of warrior energy. But it always speaks to the king. And one One of the things that I'll show you soon, maybe next week, is the way in which the magician, archetype, is always in an opposition to the king and queen.

[00:08:42.700] 
There are two fundamental oppositions built into the structure of the psyche, the opposition between the magus, trickster stuff in the king and queen, and the opposition between the lover and the warrior. Freud did all this work on the opposition between the lover and aggression, the warrior. Adler did all this stuff on the opposition between power and social interest. Jung thought that the fact that you could do an Adlerian treatment of a personality and a Freudian treatment, and they're both right, he thought that was a problem of perception, typological perception in the psychologist. It's not a problem of typological perception in the psychologist at Both of them are seeing stuff that's really there. The Adlerian sees the polarity of power, and the Freudian sees the polarity between love and aggression. Both are structures that really exist in the structure of your psyche. In other words, when you're seeing the prophet, the prophet is just a mature version of the trickster. One of the things we got to talk about when we're talking about what you can do when you're a mature man in this particular... In other words, I like to say that there are only four initiations for a man, these four.

[00:10:10.750] 
If you've got your magician initiation worked out, Then the trickster in you will take on all pomposity wherever it manifest, whether it's in your personality or anybody else's. See that? That's what it's for. It's there to help you see through grandiosity and pomposity of those in power, including yourself. That's why it's in the wiring. It's the inner profit. If the trickster, as we will see the third week when we're talking about pathology, if your trickster is not working right, it's It still does its thing. There are a lot of men whose trickster is working, but what it does is it constantly trips them up. They can't build a thing in their life because the trickster constantly is tripping them up. They're good at practical jokes. They're good at cracking jokes. They're good at criticizing everybody. Everybody else. But the interesting thing about somebody that's trickster is not working correctly is that they're doubly good at criticizing themselves, and their self-esteem is shot to hell. So anytime a man has got his trickster, it always functions. When it's not functioning in a mature way, it's a loose cannon, and it blows you to bits. It's like that pistol that you got at the barrels mounted backwards.

[00:12:07.590] 
Every time you shoot, it blows your brains out. That's the trickster when it's not working right in a man's personality. But that's a long answer to a short question. But anyway, you'll see that these things are all on the sector of the personality, which is in opposition to the abuse of power. All of them, trickster Mages. Look at the biblical tradition, the Prophet Nathan opposing King David.

[00:12:35.740] 
See that?

[00:12:38.180] 
Other comments or questions before we go on to this. Let me take about two minutes now and run through this third one here, and then we will discuss for a few more minutes. It's taken me a long time to realize That the heterogeneity of space, that is the fact that humans experience space differently. It's not all the same. Space is not the same to human beings. According to Mercy Eliade, Modern people tend to assume that space is homogeneous for humans, that there are not special spaces as opposed to ordinary spaces. But the fact is that all humans experience different kinds of geography in their psyche. What I have realized is that each of these archetypal configurations constitutes in the human's experience a radically different experience of space and time. I've laid them out here for you. Now, why is this important in terms of the magician? I told you earlier. When the magician in you is fully functioning, you will be able to recognize these spaces, all of them. You'll be able to know when you're in one, and you'll be able to tell whether or not you're in a space which is appropriate for what it is you're trying to do.

[00:14:29.560] 
Let me Let me just give you a few examples. If you're trying to be a father to your children, and you're always in the warrior space, you got problems. Because all you're going to see is those little demons that are ruining your life. Because when you're in the warrior space, you're wired for demons. When your warrior comes up in you, this is something you got to get clear about. When the warrior comes up in you, enemy comes up at the same time. My child, the enemy. Have you ever heard of any parents like that? What I need to do to my child?

[00:15:18.720] 
Kill him if possible.

[00:15:22.170] 
I know I can't beat him to death, but I can sure ridicule him to death, shame him to death. That's called dysfunctional family space. If a father cannot get into the king energy, he will not be able to know what to do with children. Because the king space is the space of caring in a just way, carrying, creating a peaceful order that things may grow and develop into what they were meant to be. That's That's what king and queen energy does. Okay, so if you're trying to create something, if you're trying to create a world, a cosmos, if you're trying to create civilization, you got to have this king energy or queen energy. You got to be in that space so that you can feel that. If you're not connected with this archetypal circuit, I like to think, that won't even have them occur to you as an agenda. And think of all the people you know for whom that does not occur as an agenda. And if you raise that as an agenda, they'll look at you like, Well, you're naive, so and so. Talking about peace with justice. You are such a naive.

[00:16:52.220] 
You're talking about... This is one of the things that fascinates me. They will say that you're a utopian. No No place. Utopia, no place. That is the most wrong-headed thing I ever heard of. Do you realize the only way you get a place is through this, through Cosmos? The essence of place is cosmos. You cannot create ordered space without that sense. The amazing thing to me is these people that accuse you of being utopian, if you're trying to think about a peaceful, just order. That's not no place at all. That's supposed to be this place. You have to think about that. But That is what's wrong with our modern world right now. It's very difficult to find people who will take it as a part of their responsibility to imagine Cosmos. That's the circuit of the king. Warrior space. If you can't find this space, you won't be able to get yourself together and do anything. See, I mean, if you're in the lover space, you do not understand work. Work. Work is not a concept in the lover space. If you think you're in the loverspace and you still think work, you're not in the loverspace.

[00:18:35.780] 
All these people that are trying to work on their sex lives, that's not the loverspace. You really got to get your mind around the implications of that. If you're working on it, that's warrior space. That's the only circuit that understands work. The magician space is the space at its purest level without the integration of the other potentials of understanding. It wants to know. It wants to be able to see, to discern. You ever read bumper stickers?

[00:19:35.750] 
It's a great anthropological endeavor.

[00:19:39.410] 
There's this real popular one now. You've probably seen it. It's profound.

[00:19:43.230] 
It says, Shit happens.

[00:19:46.950] 
Seeing that one?

[00:19:48.840] 
Shit happens.

[00:19:51.720] 
Now, there's something you know about this person. The The person that has that bumper sticker on their car does not know about the existence of a magician circuit.

[00:20:08.510] 
I'm not kidding you.

[00:20:11.280] 
You see a lot of these folks. Shit happens. This person hasn't the faintest idea about understanding of any magician energy at all. That's the thing you take refuge in when you have no magician energy. You don't even know you ought to try to understand what happens. Well, 14 relationships later, shit happens. I mean, just apply that. This is the way we view toxic waste. It's the nuclear regulatory commissions. Think about that. What about all this nuclear waste that we don't know what to do with? Oh, shit happens. Next week, one of the things we'll talk about is enchantment and denial and the magus. If your magus is online, you're not into massive denial. If your magus is not online and functioning, you'll just be in massive happy denial. You'll be one of these happy folks that hasn't the slightest idea about what's going on in this world. You got that? Okay. The idea is, and we'll try to get into this a lot more, is when that magician in you is working, not only are you going to be able to tell where you are, but you're going to be able to be with somebody about five seconds and tell where they are.

[00:21:56.620] 
If you are wanting to get into the garden with somebody you find very attractive, and they're in the warrior space, you will know that this is going to be difficult. I didn't say impossible. Okay, let me stop there and let's take a few minutes. Our time is formerly up, but let's take a few minutes for some questions and then hang on to your questions that we don't get to tonight. We'll take them next week when we start. Yeah. The comment is that he You got the impression that if your magician is fully online and working properly, that you can move in different spaces fairly quickly, relatively at will. I think that's true. You know what the Freudians call that?

[00:22:44.240] 
No.

[00:22:46.430] 
That's a mature ego. They call that ego strength. If you want to know what the... You're trying to figure out what they mean by that, that's what they mean by that. Somebody who can relate the situations appropriately and access the libido they need for that situation in an adaptive, assertive way. And they're right. But they don't communicate very well the complexity of this business. And this is what it's about. Is there a sequence to this? Well, there's undoubtedly a developmental process a person goes through. And one of the things we'll get into later is that because see, the bad joke is this. Every one of us came up in these families where no matter what the socio-biological program was in our genes about how this all developed, our families and our culture Our ethnicity and our families always make us actualize certain spaces and stay out of others. One of the things you need to think about is what your family did to you in terms of which rooms in the mansions of the psyche you're allowed access to. Because in a different... See, we could take a poll, maybe we ought to later on, but which families made it possible for you to get to the garden and really value sexuality and joy and passion, and which shuts you out of that.

[00:24:27.500] 
Or think about your family. The The fascinating and terrible demonic thing about this is that different siblings in the same family are given different injunctions and different messages about this. You can be an ex-child in the family, and you can be given the keys to the garden. But your sister or your brother may be given keys only to the king. In other words, they got to take care of everybody. See? Okay. If you're a person, sometimes a first born.

[00:25:03.800] 
That's right.

[00:25:05.280] 
Yeah, back here. Question, if you were a child, what if you had a hidden magician? All children have a hidden magician because that's the way they survive. It's your little trickster. If you didn't have your trickster, man, you would not survive your family. It's a bear rabbit. The child is bear rabbit. And so a lot of the time, if you've really been an abusive family, you'll have a really highly developed trickster. Thank goodness, because you'd be dead if you didn't. So the child develops that trickster stuff very early. And the more abusive the family, the more compulsive it will be in you.

[00:25:58.210] 
Yeah, back here at the back.

[00:26:00.390] 
The question is, this is very difficult stuff. What hope is there for us if a person doesn't know about this in the first place and if they don't get any help to be able to get the lay of the land and be able to figure out how to negotiate it. Well, as I say, I'm not an optimist. I am hopeful, but it's a very condition hope. I'm not an optimist because if you When you look at the situation on the planet, if your magician is working at all, you see that we have a planet. They made this movie Lord of the Flies. But, hell, that's just business as usual here on this planet. Planet's being run by boys and girls and big bodies. I'm not optimistic at all, but you see, what does make me hopeful is if you just look Look very carefully at this. This isn't all that complicated. I have never seen men or women who could not get a hold of this fairly quickly when they just have it laid out. You don't need to have a big shovel to deal with this. Once you understand what these different things in you are for are there for, and once you understand how they interrelate with each other, it's pretty quick for you to be able to tell where you're weakest.

[00:27:39.400] 
One of the things that I've been trying to do is to help people realize you don't have to wait around forever to get to work on this stuff. If your warrior isn't working, it's pretty easy for you to figure out ways to start trying to tune that thing up. If you weren't working on your magician, you wouldn't be here tonight. I mean, this stuff is... See, we have a modern problem, this professionalism crap. That is to say, the idea that the only people who can be magicians or psychologists with PhDs. Well, the old peoples of Earth didn't have any foolishness like that going on. If you got to be a grown up, You were a ritual elder. That's what it meant to become an adult. You assumed the ritual responsibilities for your people, and especially for the young people. My vision of this stuff is very simple. It's not an extraordinary view at all. It's the view of most of the men leaders today in the men's movement. We're not interested in making a bunch of PhD psychologists. We're interested in having men understand that they are quite capable of understanding the things they need to know, and that not only are they quite capable of understanding it, it will not take them forever to learn it.

[00:29:14.770] 
Not only will it not take them forever to learn it, we all better be about applying it. I'm not hopeless at all about this business, and I see a lot of evidence. Look, I go around working with a blind, other folks, Michael Mead and John Stokes and other people. I see a hell of a lot of men that are doing this stuff. A lot of them are carpenters, a lot of them are electricians, a lot of them are recovering alcoholics and drug addicts. They are quite capable of getting at this stuff, and they're getting busy about being men and doing men's responsibilities. So don't make it too esoteric. That's a magician's trick. That's what the magician does when he wants up his fees.

[00:30:02.410] 
You got it?

[00:30:04.660] 
Well, among the Apache and the Navajo and a lot of these other people around the world, you didn't have to pay them $150 an hour. When you became a man, you assume responsibility for this stuff. That's where we have to get back to. We've got to get to the point to where being a knowledgeable ritual elder does not mean a psychoanalyst or a psychologist. It simply means you're a man. That's where we got to get to. We got to stop right now, and we'll get back into this next week. I'll stick around for some questions after. Thanks a lot.

[00:30:40.510] 
Tonight, as you saw in your catalog, we're going to have We're talking about the role of the magician, the archetype of the magician in masculine selfhood. Again, for you women, I really think we have to understand that there is a female partner in the psyche of a man, the female magician, and that there is a counterpart in the feminine psyche which has similar responsibilities. You can do your own translation. I'm going to address myself to the masculine self tonight, and I hope you will bear with me in that. But I'll talk about a number of tasks: disenchantment, the task of being able to understand and practice disenchantment, and the task of discernment, The task of being able to understand and practice disenchantment, and the task of discernment, the task of accepting the challenge of initiation, and the task of empowering the healer within. But let's get started. I put the first task of the archetype of the magician and masculine selfhood as this enchantment. Now, that may seem odd to you, but the word enchantment is a very important thing in human mythological or religious history. Enchantment is the traditional mythological word for what we call today denial.

[00:32:40.280] 
The first task, the very first task, in the development of the magician within, and its very first purpose for a man is to break through his denial. Now, Now, let me just talk just a little bit about denial and how it operates and how it's related to enchantment. Any of you in 12-Step programs know how important denial is as a concept for survival and not survival. One of the first things you'll learn in 12-Step program is that you have to deal with your denial. You don't deal with your denial, you're going to die. It's that simple. What I'd like for us to understand is we're trying to understand the importance of this circuit in your psyche is to understand that this is true personally, but this is also true for the planet. Now, what has been the case in pre-modern mythologies, we all understood in pre-modern modern mythologies, the tribal wisdom, that any time there is a personal denial, there's also a social denial. It's very intriguing to me today to look at the extent in which denial operates on a global basis. It is a not knowing. It is a very determined not knowing.

[00:34:37.870] 
A little later, when we get into discussing, you will probably want to think about how this not knowing is not only related to the lack of the functioning of the magician. It's also related to the warrior stuff not being online. But here you can really see it. This is why in so many fairy tales and myths and cultural narratives, you bring in the source Sorcerer when you want to have someone who can see. The true sorcerer in all of these stories and all these traditions is There's always someone who can see. What is seeing? When you see that concept used in myth and story, it always has a very specific meaning. It means being able to get past denial and to be able to look at the reality of a situation. In other words, the very first thing that the magician in a man's psyche is to do is to help him wake up. Some of you may have studied the work of the great Magus Gordiev. His whole system was based on waking up. That's not unusual. That's what all of the great Magi have emphasized, you got to wake up, you got to see what is, you got to look at the handwriting on the wall.

[00:36:43.990] 
Just uncovering the actual situation is the first most important task of this circuit. How do you know a man doesn't have this? Well, you can usually apply this test. How sad is a man compared to how depressed he is? In other words, you need to be able to make a distinction between depression and sadness. A man is depressed when he is not seeing. He doesn't know why he's depressed. He just depressed. This is, I think, because usually a depression is based on hidden grandiosity. In other words, if you're depressed, it's because of some hidden inflation that you cannot see. Your trickster has not helped you see it yet. But if the magician is working, you are not so much depressed as you are sad. In Isaiah, it talks about the Messiah. What is said about the Messiah there in Isaiah is really said about the man for whom the magician is functioning. He is a man of sorrows and acquainted with grief. Why is it that if you attend one of these men conferences and in that sacred space that's created there, that safe space where one is permitted to let the truth emerge without being ridiculed, why is it that what emerges so much is of sadness and grieving?

[00:39:10.250] 
If you saw Blie's interview that Moyers did, Robert Blie's emphasis on grief and the importance of grief for men. This is the way to understand that. Why is it? Why that men grieve when they start dealing with their identity as men? It's because they break through their denial. The way you know whether or not you're breaking through or have broken through your denial is how sad are you? Point. If this thing is working in you today, you will be sad. There is no way to be an adult, grown up, initiated male today without being very sad and grieve a lot. While it is true that one grieves, one would grieve about one's own story and one's own journey and one's own tragic experience. It's not just that. One is capable of grieving about other things. That is That's the first functional potential that this thing is for. You can test how well it's working by simply having a continuum between depression and sadness and see where you locate on that. I said I'd talk a little bit about the role of the trickster, you know, Coyote in the Native American tales. If this organization in your psyche is functioning well, then it means that the man has his bullshit indicator intact and working, functional.

[00:41:36.280] 
Now, I'll go into this a lot more this summer, but let me just say a little bit about the, and I'll say a lot more about it next week about malfunctioning and functioning of the trickster, how you can tell. I indicated a little bit about it a few months ago when I said, If you're not aware of where your hidden grandiosity is, then your trickster isn't working. In fact, if you're not very aware of it, your trickster is very likely to start working automatically and compulsively. See? That is to say, if you don't know where your grandiosity tends to sneak in, you're very likely to really screw up in a big way soon. And that will be the trickster operating compulsively. The goal, however, is to have the trickster operate not compulsively, but have it operating consciously in an integrated way. Well, what could that be? Well, one of the most important things is to understand that... Here's the important point here. If you're giving your power away, the job of the trickster is to find out where it is that you're doing this and to interrupt it. I want to talk about that just for a minute.

[00:43:19.070] 
I've put up here idealization and disempowerment. There's this thing in psychoanalysis we talk about is idealizing transferences. The bad thing is that that is not just something that happens with psychotherapists. Whenever you notice yourself being less powerful, less competent, less able to think on your feet, less able to function, feeling scattered, disoriented, and so forth with other people, you're giving your power away. You're in the midst of a compulsive idealization of the person or persons you are with. It's very important to understand this. Just monitor yourself as we just practiced this this week. You notice when you start feeling small, helpless, stupid, you can't get your mind to work, immobilized. When you're feeling that way in the presence of other people, you are involved in an idealizing projection, idealizing transference, which you are not really aware of. It's very compulsive. What has to happen is that must be broken up because that's fraudulent. You have to take your power back, but you can't take your power back unless this trickster function comes to your aid and exposes this. In premodern cultures, this was always institutionalized because they had more wisdom about this than we did.

[00:45:18.030] 
They would always have the jester at the court of the king. The Joker wasn't just a film character, in other words. It was something you welcomed men all the time because you knew if you didn't have the jester there, that the king was going to forget his human. Well, if you're a trickster, if your inner Joker is not working, you're going to be giving your power away right and left to men and women. Coyote tends to be a little gross sometimes, but it's helpful to know sometimes when you should fart. You need to read some of those stories. You'll know what I mean. That is, when you get to giving your power away, this is an enchantment. This has to be disenchanted. They're important things for a grown up to do. If all the power is being given away, one is disempowered and is, in fact, still emotionally a child. You see how this works? Part of the disenchantment is to get past the denial of the social situation and so on. But another important part of the disenchantment is to get yourself out of the enchantment that is taking away your power. Children appropriately give away their power to their parents who are supposed to hold it for them until they can receive it back at a phase-specific rate.

[00:46:59.920] 
Parents are to steward this king and queen transference. The problem is, most of us have had the experience of child's parents who didn't really know what to do with all that idealization and handled it poorly. That creates adults who are the same. Now you You have them as your bosses, your executives that you work with, other people in your institutions. It's always interesting to me when I run into persons who are surprised when their superiors do not relate to them in an empowering way. It tends to be more the rule rather than the exception, even in places where you would think that would not be the case. Religious communities, et cetera. But it's really fairly widespread. Giving away one's power is a mark of a lack of initiation. It is certainly a mark of lack of initiation in the magician because if your trickster is functioning, it will expose that. You will get at least a sense of humor about it, and you'll bring it back. It doesn't mean they're going to like it. Understand that. People always can tell when the idealization has been stopped. They want to talk about that later. I thought I'd talk a little bit about the film Batman.

[00:48:56.850] 
You should see that if you haven't, because it really gets this trickster material. You can really think about the Joker as Batman's Shadow. The dead giveaway on that, if you haven't seen that, see this film, because the dead giveaway is that here comes Batman, he's flying along in his high tech airplane. All this firepower comes out of the side, and the Joker is standing down there with his pistol. Batman comes soaring over Gotham City and makes a flourishing sweep and he comes. That doesn't sound grandiose, does it? He comes sweeping down and he gets him in his sights, and he starts to fire on the Joker and starts to fire on the Joker, and all these machine guns can't seem to kill the Joker, right? It's hard to hit the trickster. Hard to get him in your sights. But the Joker raises his pistol up, fires one shot, and shoots down Batman's plane. Think about that. That's the role of the Joker. That's what the Joker is for in your psyche. It's to shoot you down when in your adolescent grandiosity, you are not really grounded. You do not realize the way in which you are responsible for not engaging the things you need to engage.

[00:50:32.350] 
That's just the Joker bringing Batman down to Earth a little bit, where they can be engaged, where there can be a real engagement. This is very basic magician stuff. If you haven't seen that film, look at that and think about it as the ongoing struggle between our ungrounded grandiosity that thinks it's the hero but never comes out, and the part of us that is able to see through everything. I said that another aspect besides this enchantment, which is a lot in itself, is the task of discernment. Now, this is a term which you hear used in traditions of Christian spirituality. But if you understand what it's about, it's in all of these traditions of spirituality and healing. A mark of the magus is that he is capable of discernment. What does that mean? He knows there's there's such a thing as evil, period. Not only does he know there's such a thing as evil, he can see it when it's there. He has an understanding of the nature and dynamics of it. He is not subject to the denial that afflicks most other folks that tend to try to live like this is Eden, in an uncontested territory, so to speak.

[00:52:35.100] 
The movie which you ought to look at to get a feel for this aspect, The Magician, is an old one. It's Peter Blady's movie, The Exorcist. If you look at that movie very carefully, not only can you get some insight into traditional symbolisms of evil, you can get insight into this side of the magician in the man's psyche. In the beginning of that movie, you see illness, disorder, chaos, house affecting helpless people. You see a representation of what obviously the filmmaker intends you to understand is people who are sorciers apprentices. They have lots of degrees with very little insight. They have the best credentials, but no understanding. What finally has to occur is that they have to find this old man who clearly, according to the way the movie is presented, is Omegus. In the In the very early scenes of the movie, what you see is a symbol for this aspect of the magician within. The old priest is digging in an archeological dig. He gets beneath the surface, see. He's brushing off an object that he's found, and it is a face of a demon. In that one scene, you can see this aspect of the magician.

[00:54:30.050] 
Because the magician is one who uncovers the face of evil, and he does not run from it. Even though, as you see later in the movie, even though his life is threatened by it, and if, and we'll get to this healer role of the magician later, but even though if he accepts his responsibility as a healer, his life will be endangered, and we see by the end of the movie that he is indeed killed. That is. In other words, being able to see that... People have said that Carl Jung, obviously, was a magus of some rank. One of the things you notice Jung doing is always trying to say to people, Look, evil is real. You have to learn to see it. You have to learn to understand it. You can't continue pretending that there's not aggressive destructiveness in the world. This got him in lots of trouble. But just simply from the point of view of this sector of the psyche is the capacity to understand that there is malignant destruction malignant in this world. If this part of a man is developed, he can see the face of malignant destructiveness, what I like to call seeing the dragon.

[00:56:16.430] 
He can see the dragon when it appears in himself. That's where he needs to learn to see it first. What is the dragon? Dragon is pathological infantile grandiosity. It's what it always It's the Jolly green giant within. But you're unable to see that wherever it appears, and you're able to understand that that thing is dangerous. It is not benign. If you don't understand it and understand what you need to deal with it, it's going to destroy you and probably your society with it, with you. Now, it's very difficult to find anybody today that really presses this issue. It's very interesting. You can find a lot of people that think that the solution to all the world's problems is learning to follow your bliss. Well, that's the archetype of lover talking. See, when you talk to the archetype of lover, and that's all the person is into right then. They don't know anything about enemies, and they don't know anything about evil. If you just follow your bliss, you won't ever have to understand anything, and you won't ever have to fight anything. A lot of new age folks are in this place. But the magician within, if your magician is functioning, you will be able to know There is a dragon, and you will be able to get past your denial to see the dragon bites on your arms and your legs.

[00:58:25.060] 
You don't have to be a junkie with heroine to have dragon bites on your arms and legs. I won't ask for a show of hands. But you'll be able to see them on you, and you'll be able to see it when it's in the room. Like that New Yorker cartoon that I'd like to mention about the two couples sitting in the living room having a pleasant conversation over tea. There's this humongous dragon standing behind one of the couples, the couple that own the house. They're saying, We deal with it by talking about it. That's the typical magician problem. We'll get to that one. You're going to understand it. You're going to talk about it. You're going to study it. If I'm a good enough magician, I won't have to be a warrior. Okay, let me talk a little bit about initiation. Where is lots of talk about initiation these days? A lot of experts on this topic. Let me say a little bit about what the challenge of initiation is. It's a lot things. But I think the first thing which is the challenge of initiation, and trying to get the magician functioning on this topic, is to understand But there is such a thing.

[01:00:16.800] 
It's very important to understand that. First of all, there is such a thing as initiation. A lot of people, they don't have any idea of that. They think we got these eternal adolescences just accidentally. But what a lot of people do not talk about is that you do not have a concept of initiation without a concept of maturity. You get a concept of initiation, It's a stage theory of development into something that we might well call human maturity. The first thing is just to understand that there is a task of human maturation.

[01:00:59.520] 
I I'd like to suggest that the first and foremost thing that a man needs to understand is that for all practical purposes, there are four initiations that a man faces, the four that we've been talking about, and they're not the same.

[01:01:19.660] 
It's important to understand. You can't just do the warrior initiation. You can't just do a king initiation. You can't just do a lover initiation. It's one of these. One needs to understand that when we're talking about the... I mean, there are lots of initiations, the Nights of Columbus, The masons. We're talking about human initiation and human adulthood, human maturity here, particularly that of the male. For that, there are four, these four initiations, and each of them is different. Each of requires different things. The first thing about the magician in the psyche is, if you're going to develop that side, he's got to understand what the task is. He's got to be able to read maps. In other words, for the magician stuff to get online with regard to this task in a man, the potential in the man is for him to be able to understand what he has to do on all of these. The first thing you'd say, whether you understand there is a task, that it is leading toward human maturity, masculine maturity, and that the four cornerstones of masculine maturity are these four initiations, and that they all are interlocking. They cannot really be finished.

[01:02:55.030] 
Each one cannot really be finished without development in the others. You know that there are four. Then the magician within has to have some understanding about what development in each one would look like. I don't have really time tonight to lay that stuff out. I've laid it out in other ways, in other places, in other lectures. But it goes something like this in each of them. First, First, you have to know that there is an energy that goes with the particular initiation. That is a potential, power. You got to know that there is one. See, there are a lot of men who in one or more of these initiation, these sectors of the psyche, do not feel themselves to have any of the power that goes with that sector. The first thing a man has to do is to have the magician in himself working well enough to know there are four powers in here. As William Blake said, there are four great ones within every man. There are four powers in here. I need to know what they are first, then I need to connect it. I need to experience that power and that energy.

[01:04:35.690] 
To the extent that you're really alienated from any particular one of these energy, you will not probably be able to experience it in you first. But that's not the job to experience it in yourself first. That is, you got to know it exists, you got to experience it, and you may have to experience it in another man first. If the magician in a man is working, he will have a sense of which of these powers he does not know. Then he will be a quester. He will try to find a man that has the power that he feels that he lacks the most. That man may be alive or it may be a historical figure. In other words, you know You know the power exists, you find some way to connect with it, then you want to experience it in yourself. Then you want to gradually go from feeling of conscious incompetence to conscious competence to unconscious competence in that power. But all this is all preliminary because the real task is to figure out what the power is for. That is, once you get it, what do you do with it? There are a lot of men in this world who They may not have much other initiation, but they got their warrior initiation up to a certain level.

[01:06:38.970] 
But for the life of them, they can't figure out what it's for. The fully initiated man has figured out what that warrior energy is for. He's figured out it's not to rape and dominate the weak. Most of the men in the world and in history never figured that one out. But anyway, this is the same thing. You can work on this with each one of these initiations and the movement towards Connecting with understanding that there is this, connecting with it, bringing it inside, experiencing it within, gradually becoming more competent and effective with it, and then figuring out what it's for in a wider sense. That's the challenge of initiation. Then, as the gentleman says, there is the question of ritual process initiation. That's where the understanding of sacred space comes in. And understanding ritual leadership comes in. Change process occurs in ritual space. Transformations exist exist in ritual space under the conditions of containment. Now, that's getting to the task of becoming a guide for others. When this magician energy starts consolidating, not only do you understand the task of initiation and geography of initiation, so to speak, the powers, not only do you look at yourself on this and start working on your own empowerment.

[01:08:33.940] 
You know that when you get to the point of having this energy fairly developed in yourself, you're not going to just use it to sell more soap on Madison Avenue. You're going to start serving as a guide for others. That's where you become a ritual leader. It doesn't mean you have to get a PhD and become a psychologist or psychotherapist. Throughout most of the history of the human race, men understood that there are plenty of ritual responsibilities around for everyone, for every man. Every man needs to be a ritual leader, both in this initiatory task, personally and socially, and also in a healing task. You can think about ritual leadership in terms for the magician as having these two kinds of emphasis. You can see it as a empowerment emphasis for helping people come of age to the point that they can get in touch with their powers and then helping guide them in terms of understanding what their power is for. But then there's the healing task, because under the conditions of existence, as Paul Tillich would put it, under the conditions of existence, there has been such enormous wounding, both personally and socially, that the knowledge and power of the magician is needed to begin to engage that.

[01:10:23.220] 
Now, that's why we could say that when this power in a man gets really fully developed, that's when you can start talking about shamanic initiation, the initiation of the shaman, which is just another way of talking about the healer. Because when this side of a man's psyche is fully developed, he is not simply one who seeks to understand. If you look at the practice of the shaman in in premodern tribal cultures. They are not detached. Now, next week, I'll be talking about the psychopathology of the magician and how to tell if you, when you regress, do you become a crazy warrior or do you become a crazy magician Magician, et cetera, et cetera. We'll be talking about what happens when you regress into this thing and you become a crazy magician. One of the things we'll talk about next week is detachment. Do you tend to You detach. Go away when you get regressed. If you do, if you tend to be alone a lot, you probably become a crazy magician there. But at the full development of this thing, when this thing is really online and really working, that tendency in the magician does not appear because the strengths of the other sides of the psyche, the other circuits, have become so integrated in this person that they don't have any fantasy of just understanding the world's ills and just scientifically being to attached about that.

[01:12:16.960] 
If you got somebody that can scientifically study the starvation that's going to be happening in Ethiopia, sure, Really. You do not. I don't care how many PhD as the man's got. He's not got an initiated MAGUS. See? You follow that? Let me stop there. Well, let me not stop there. Let me close with an image before our break. We'll come back after our break, and we'll I'll discuss this stuff in some depth. I put up there keys to the Kingdom, and I put that up there because I think if you look at the Christian myth, you see Saint Peter portrayed in the The Image of the Magus. It's very interesting to look at that image of Peter in the Christian myth and think about the magician and the initiation of the magician. What is a magician like when the magician gets initiated? You can see all sorts of things. The really uninitiated magician, one who is finally uninitiated, is in the denial. Peter is in the massive denial. But Christ, who in the Christian myth is the King, the true King, Christ says that you have the keys to the kingdom. Well, there's a sense in which the initiated magician does have the keys to the Kingdom of the male psyche.

[01:14:28.220] 
All the spaces, knows how to enter them, knows how to get out of them. Whatever you bind on earth will be bound in heaven, et cetera. There is something in the magician that can really affect changes, powerful changes that control psychic geography. But But I think it's very instructive to look at the little dialog that the Gospels portray when the King Ask the magician, Who do you say that I am? Because the temptation of the magician in the male psyche is always to interpret away all of the realities of kinship, all of the realities and responsibilities of kinship. That is, the Joker part of you, when it's not integrated, thinks everybody's a criminal, see? Doesn't think there is any possibility of Cosmos, so why work for it? That is the just order with peace. Look at this dialog between the magician and the king. What has to happen for the magician to grow up and function and prokathy? Well, the magician has got to stop saying. You notice in the psyche, there are two oppositions, the opposition between the lover and the warrior, and the opposition between the king and the The Magus. The Magus has...

[01:16:34.960] 
The King says to the magus, Who do you say that I am? The response for the mature magician is, thou art the Messiah, that is to say, you are the king who redeems. Until the magician part of a man's psyche gets to the point that he can get over being a deconstructionist. You literary critics have to get that joke. Start using his knowledge and power as a magician to serve the creation of a just order. It's not an initiated magician. Let me stop there. Let's take our break. Let's come back in about 15 minutes and we'll discuss That's this stuff. Clarifying what I was saying at the end when I was talking about the Christian myth in terms of Peter in Christ, it's what I was saying that the true initiated Magus recognizes as a true king. Yes, that's exactly what I'm saying. You can generalize this, too. You can say that whenever any of these four powers in the male psyche is fully developed, it does not deny the necessity for the others. See what... You can generalize this, too. You can say that whenever any of these four powers in the male psyche is fully developed, it does not.


audo_enhanced_The Magician Within 04.mp3	[00:00:00.350] - Speaker 1
Remember when we were talking about E. M. Butler last week, about how the magus always gets killed in the myth? Yeah, well, that's what happens when you realize it, when you think you don't need the warrior. You're going to try to solve everything without your warriors. The same thing would be true just around the table.

[00:00:24.850] - Speaker 2
But it's particularly true for the magician.

[00:00:28.610] - Speaker 1
Remember, the The dialectics built into the structure of the psyche, according to my view of the psyche. I really think this structure exists in the actual geometry of the psyche, you get two oppositions, and only two fundamental oppositions in the structure of the deep self. The opposition between king and magician, and which Jung picked up as the the Adlerian power emphasis, and the struggle between the lover and the warrior, which Freud Emphasize in terms of eros and phanotos, the love and aggression. To the extent that you become mature, initiated and integrated as a man, you You do not let those oppositions drop out. You are able to see the necessity for both sides, stop denying the importance of each. In a way, there are so many people today. Look at this. You can tell when you find, I often like to say in men's groups, when you find a cynical, nihilistic man, know you got a boy. Because when you do not have the king, you're cynical and nihilistic. Because it is only through that connection with the king that you can get the tap root that organizes the psyche, helps to deal with all the foundation you need to monitor all these energies that are in the...

[00:02:35.110] - Speaker 1
Particularly in the lover and the warrior. If you're really connected with your lover energy and or your warrior energy. There's going to be so much extraverted, powerful energy surging through you. It's going to make you crazy if you don't have a tap root down. The only way to get that is through the king stuff.

[00:03:02.700] - Speaker 2
The magician, first of all, we say, we review.

[00:03:11.030] - Speaker 1
It helps you to see what is, including the spaces that exist. It helps you to discern what you need to be able to discern. It helps you to understand the task of initiation, and then it helps you to understand what it is you're supposed to do with it once you get it?

[00:03:33.970] - Speaker 2
See?

[00:03:34.960] - Speaker 1
Okay, somebody back here. Yes. Two concerns. One, given the fact that the magician is the one who can locate you in the spaces of the psyche and has some understanding about the keys. What can we say about what this has to do with any particular order of development of these initiations? Well, I think that's a very complicated thing, but let me just address it a number of ways. One way I would address that is that it's no accident that for most of human history, men put enormous amounts of time into spirituality. Now, what does that mean? That means that they were learning teaching stories. Robert Blier has talked about this a lot He's right. Michael Mead has talked about this a lot, and other leaders in what's being called often now the mytho-poetic movement. That There was a time... It's hard to, for example, in the churches and synagogues today, it was hard to find much enthusiasm among men. It's really interesting the way that has gotten to the point where a lot of men can't understand what spirituality has to do with being a man at all. But that's modernity. In most of the history of this planet, with regard to our species, men invested enormous amounts of time learning myths.

[00:05:44.080] - Speaker 1
They weren't doing that just because they liked stories. See, that's a modern attitude about this.

[00:05:52.090] - Speaker 2
Why did men study myths?

[00:05:55.800] - Speaker 1
Because they contained, they were what we We call today operators manuals for the psyche. Now, what does this got to do with the development of the personality and development of the magus? When you're studying myths in these tribal local culture, you're learning the maps. You're developing the magus. When you're telling young men, when you're an elder in the tribe and you're telling young men these stories, You're not just trying to give them a hard time, make them learn a lot of stuff. You're trying to get them to learn the stories so they will understand what it is to be human and what their responsibilities are when they're fully initiated. This is why I like to say, you can't be sane without myth. Because without myth, you're not going to have any place to put your grandiosity. You're not going to have the other world. You're not going to have the king in the other world and the queen in the other world is what I like to say. If you have, as tribal culture said, if you have the other world, the mythic world, as they used to say, the real one, The real world.

[00:07:31.550] - Speaker 1
Eliades pointed out that for premodern tribal humanity, it was a world of myth that was really real. We were real to the extent that we participate in it. So if you really participate in the mythic, to that extent, you're real. Well, think Jungian here. What is in the myths? The archetypal. What is in the archetypal power to live? Then you'll be able to see why they felt that way. There were Polynesian warriors who understood when they had the fight of war. They didn't just study some book on it. They got into the myth and became participant in this energy of the mythic warrior of their people. If you read this book that I recommend, this Sullivan book, there's this great accounting there of an exorcism an exorcism in a Hindu culture in which the magician takes on the mythic power of Sheila in order to have the power to heal the person he's trying to heal. See that? It's all about empowerment. If you say, Well, what do you have to do first? Well, it's all a spiral. It's all a circumambulation of the pyramid of the self, of course. I think there's some evidence to say that probably men get the warrior, magician stuff first.

[00:09:46.170] - Speaker 1
Later on, if they're lucky, they start discovering the lover stuff more. If they have a lot of elders around who are initiated, later on, they really get clarity about the king stuff. Hardest part. But given the difference in families, that gets screwed up. If your family didn't want you to be armed, if you're from Winnetka. Can't play with guns if you're a little boy. So you may be very wounded. If you grew up in Winnetka, you may be real wounded in your war. Here if you're a boy. Questions about...

[00:10:35.080] - Speaker 2
She's a school psychologist.

[00:10:36.480] - Speaker 1
She's noticed the way little boys tend to be very outrageous in their choice of things to play with, like guns and be interested in Batman and all sorts of horror movies with Freddie, the sadistic killer, et cetera. It's very important. Let me just comment about it in the context of the magician. It's very important for us to get out of our piety and out of our moralisms with regard to the psyche and look calmly in a very careful way at what is going on with this business. I'd like to point out this is not just a master on the issue. We have to understand that A fully adult human being is not disarmed, male or female. The sooner we understand that a fully adult male or female is fully armed and dangerous against those who would oppressed, then the planet will change. The planet will change then. You see, there's this the naive Hey, Brian is always talking about the naive male. Well, we can make that blanket. The naive male and the naive female does not understand the necessity for warrior circuitry in the psyche and does not understand what happens when that circuitry is not blessed and brought into conscious responsible stewardship.

[00:12:27.750] - Speaker 1
Well, what happens when the The warrior circuitry is not blessed and integrated and brought under responsible stewardship is what we've gotten as well right now. I got lots of comments about that, but I got a lot of warriors. Somebody asked me why I had so many He takes on the warrior. Well, it's a very hard thing. Even though men are supposed to be better at this in some ways, it is an energy, which is usually honored, because it's like Chicago, by mostly the shadow warriors. It's hard to find anybody with much warrior energy that knows what it's for. Like creating justice and defending the weak. There's a lot that could be said about that, but it's very similar on the others as well. I mean, it's like whenever When you notice somebody compulsively doing something all over the world watching Rambo movies. If you travel around the world and you go back in the villages, See all these people watching Rambo movies, one, two, three, four, probably 16 before long. Rambo 16. You got to get your magician tuned up. Why is that? Well, it's because it's very similar to the Batman movie. There's all this good messianic king energy that needs to be serving justice on this planet, serving the environment, et and so on, is split off into the unconscious in the shadow where it cannot be stewarded.

[00:14:24.670] - Speaker 1
It's going to be interesting if we ever get mature enough to get that stuff integrated off the screen and into the psyche. Think about it. It's very interesting to think about our whole entertainment industry as a psychological container. Think about that. And think about all these archetypal energies that are carried in film because we have not sufficiently befriended our archetypal psyche to start integrating that stuff. Any time you get an unintegrated archetype of content, it's always raw and primitive and scary. It's the task of the magician within to figure out what all that energy is for, how it relates to the other energies, and what needs to be done with it. Other comments. Back over here. The question is, when you're talking about these oppositions in the psyche, is there any simple way to talk about that King Magus I thought about that, and it's hard to get a thing that parallels Freud's Erosthanitas, our love and aggression. But you can talk about it in terms of power and justice. Paul Tilly, if you haven't read... Well, you see, king without the trickster would be power without conscience or power without a bullshit indicator.

[00:16:09.630] - Speaker 2
See that?

[00:16:11.350] - Speaker 1
It's like the Adlerians. What the Adlerians do with that is that they talk about the power issue where you get power as opposed to social interest. The way the Adlerians will judge how mature somebody is, is real simple, and I agree with an arm. That is, the mature personality is someone who uses their power for social interest. They put their power to work for the human cooperative tasks. Boy, if the Adlerians are right about that, we're in trouble, and they're right about that, we're in trouble, and they're right about it. But the way to think about that is just put the trickster on one side of that and the king on the other. If you can get your trickster to turn into a full-blown magician who understands that just because you have bullshit doesn't mean they're in the bull. Think about that. That is to say you've got to get to the point. See, this is very hard for young men, especially adolescents. It's very easy for an uninitiated man to assume that everybody sells out. There are no men of integrity.

[00:18:13.710] - Speaker 2
There are no men who are admirable.

[00:18:19.300] - Speaker 1
I can just go it all off. I don't have to be serious about anything. It's the trickster that exposes any human male that claims to be the king. It's the trickster that understands that the true king is inside. It's the function of the trickster to get that king inside, but not identify with it. Yeah. Well, the question is really about shamanic initiation or initiation into the material healing role. Something that's very important to get. That is to say that a merely an encounter with the archetype of psyche That is, an archetypal experience does not necessarily initiate you. That is to say you can have conversion experiences out to kazoo and not go up. There are a lot of people that go from conversion experience to conversion experience. I'm a Southern boy. My God, we majored down there. Every summer, we get converted. Revive us again. No Southerners here, I can tell that because we don't know the songs. But you see, the sense of the importance of connecting with the archetype of the luminosity in the psyche in terms of a true initiation is really key. It's a legitimate important question. I mean, it's like, what is there about this that You have this powerful experience and it doesn't change anything, really.

[00:20:35.560] - Speaker 1
You don't really mature. Well, we've got to understand. That's back to this gentleman's issue earlier about ritual, about the role of ritual and ritual process in all this. Because see, if you have a powerful archetypal experience and it's not adequately contained and adequately interpreted to you by an elder, and you're not adequately guided through that by someone who understands what it is, then you may not really be transformed. The contact with the archetypal is like plugging into the 220,000 volts. You do need the power. You can't become a man without getting in touch with power. Initiation is empowerment for both men and women. Men and women, or males and females who are not powerful, are not initiated, period. You're right to point it at connection with this archetype of this powerful experience of the sacred. But you know you can put your finger in 220,000 box without somebody around helping you understand all this circuitry, and it It kills you, it destroys your mind, or it just blows your circuits out, and your circuit breakers go, and you think you're saved.

[00:22:14.710] - Speaker 2
But when you wake up, you're just as immature as you were when you were zapped.

[00:22:21.520] - Speaker 1
I won't name any names about this in the press. But you all know who would What are you talking about in this? That's what ritual is about, ritual process. What it's for, and what it always was for, is to help you connect with the powers, the archetype of the numinus sacred powers that will empower you into your fullness and really expand you into your fullness. But you got to have somebody that understands how to connect with that without having to fry you. This is the problem of being in the modern world. We don't have enough, really, awareness of this stuff, and so we become manic depressive. We get close to the power, we get manicy, then we get depressed, come down. We don't have containment, we have depression. You get initiated, you have containment. You don't have to be depressed all the time. Listen to those lover types, we talk about the same problem with regard to the lover. All of these energies. See, this hard wiring connects you with what you need to be a large person, emotionally and psychically. If you have the right help, you can have the empowerment it takes to be truly great.

[00:23:57.150] - Speaker 1
I like to say you got to disidentify with your grandiosity. You got to befriend it. That's what yunis mean when they talk about the ego self-axis. I like to say that means befriending your grandiosity. Get to where you know you got it and you know what it's for. It's not to think you're the king or the queen. It's to give you the power you need to really fill out and be strong, creative, powerful. Yeah. So it's a sophisticated question. He's saying, why did we lose so much of our understanding about initiation if humans once had it? Well, the simple answer to that comes if you just study modernization process. I mean, the simple factual answer to that question. I mean, there's a factual answer to it, and then there's more of a why question. The factual answer is, if you study modernization, read Peter Holmes' excellent book. Peter Holmes has In fact, he's got two wonderful books on this topic that you ought to look at. First one is called Jung in Context: Modernity and the Making of a Psychology, in which he really analyzes the collapse of myth and the development of modernization and why Jung psychology responded to that vacuum.

[00:25:26.130] - Speaker 1
He's not a Jungian, incident, but he's got a real grasp of this. The other book, which continues that just came out, is called The Ability to Mourn. It's another book on using psychoanalytic theory to understand modernization. Those two books, they're hard going, but they're brilliant analysis. He's the best scholar of modernity, I think, that exists today. At one level, that's the answer. The other question, though, I think it's fun to play with. That is, well, but why do we ever let this stuff go? I think there's maybe an answer to that in the developmental task of the human species in getting beyond tribalism. Because the one major thing that the enlightenment and modernization has done through scientific development and through modern science, planetary technology and knowledge, is that was a breaking down of tribal knowledge so that there could be a space for a liminality on a planetary scale, if we're lucky. That is to say, The tribal cultures had to be transcended. So the tribal myths had to be relativized. There's no question about that because the important thing for human beings to learn is not to be a Navajo or a Samurai or an Aborigine of any culture.

[00:27:10.840] - Speaker 1
That's not the thing. That's what was once an appropriate phase, specific time in human history, that was the task. But what they were striving for then is the same type of thing that we as a species have to be striving for now. When the Apaches started out to make Apaches, they weren't trying to make Apaches. You get it? They were making humans, not Apaches. You follow that? This was true with every tribal group. Every tribal myth, whether it's Judaism, Christianity, Islam, whatever, Buddhism, Daoism, really is an attempt to have human initiation. But as long as it was tribal, it was really pseudo-speciation, finally, when you discovered that there were other tribes. See, when you're in a tribe and you discover there are other tribes, those are not humans. It's okay to do with them whatever you want to. In fact, we can use those people we capture on our raids in our rituals, human sacrifice rituals to make sure that the world works correctly. We're being good. We're trying to serve the gods. It's a good thing we have all these people we captured on our raids. They're not really people because they're from that other tribe, so we can use them in our sacrificial rituals to keep our service to the gods working.

[00:28:42.330] - Speaker 1
That's tribalism. The challenge right now, post-enlightment, I used to love to say postmodern, but with what that has come to mean in the American intellectual community, I'm going to stop using that. I won't belabor that. Those of you that are in the postmodernism know what I mean. It's really become a fed. But what I mean is when I say postmodern, I mean planetary, human, post-tribal. That is the challenge now to take all of these tribal wisdoms, all these tribal narratives, all these tribal stories, and to steward those and to use them all of his Old Testaments. That's the task. The magician task now is the same as the magician task always was for both men and women, except we've finally gotten around to We finally gotten around to the job because never before in human history has it been a possibility of getting beyond the tribal human to the human. For the first time, we're faced with a possibility of human initiation. Thanks to Joseph Campbell and Eliadi and others, We have all these Old Testaments that in them have encoded all this wisdom about what it would look like to be a human grown up.

[00:30:28.420] - Speaker 1
That's why we study all this comparative stuff because we're trying to do the same thing the old peoples of the earth did. We're trying to listen to these stories. Why don't we just have our intellectuals tell us? Well, because the modern intellectual tends to be locked in the mega space. They tend to think that you can say it all from the position of the magician. That's how we got this thing we call in contemporary There's a philosophy and literary criticism today, deconstructionism. At a recent... I just got to tell you this. Sorry about this, but humor me at just a moment. There was in the New York Times this week, there was this story about this conference on deconstructionism. Some person got up in this conference said, Well, can you tell me what you are for in a world in which the children of Ethiopia are going to be starving in large numbers very soon if we don't do something? What does deconstructionism have to say about this? There was a silence. The writer said, And after this very a long pause. The conversation continued, and nothing was said about Ethiopian children. Well, that's what happens when a magician tries to be whole out of a magician because you can't be whole out of a magician.

[00:32:21.910] - Speaker 1
What does this mean? Well, think about this. I used to be a philosophy professor before I was an analyst, and so I have a little experience of philosophers. The very interesting thing is, when you try to be a hole out of that point of view, there's no place really for action or construction. It's really true. This is a wonderful word, deconstructionism. That is the runaway magician, the windmilling magician. Cannot envision a cosmos worth fighting for. There's no king. We all know that king stuff is bullshit. There's no warrior. We all know all warriors are just sadistic killers.

[00:33:19.890] - Speaker 2
No lovers.

[00:33:22.950] - Speaker 1
All the lovers are just not objective, which is true. Do you get that? It's really, that's a long way around. Thanks for indulging me. That's a long way around to get to the point where I believe that myth is Contrary to what we've been told for many years now, that myth for human beings is superior to metaphysics. It always was and it always shall be. Why? Because it integrates the four different sides sides of a human psyche in a way that metaphysics can never do. Philosophical metaphysics can never be warrior energy. I like to remind people that when you start getting integrated, you're getting empowered. When you get empowered, you're going to have a lot of people hate your guts. They're going going to envy you. They're going to try to figure out what's wrong with you. The fantasy that we have often, the naive male or the naive female, the fantasy that they have that when they get empowered, they're going to be liked. It's just wrong. You get empowered. You remember the thing I read you from Butler at the beginning? People like to kill these magi because Because the magus is against their denial health, that's first mistake, being challenging people's denial systems and so forth and so on.

[00:35:16.580] - Speaker 1
That's right. Martin Luther King, Malcolm X. Look at the initiated magician, see, who had been killed. For example, look at Malcolm X. I mean, that That would be a hero to me, Malcolm X, in this context. Because when Malcolm X really finished his initiation, and he saw that the fully initiated man was not a racist. He ran into a lot of people that hated his guts for that. See? This is true in general. There are a lot of people around, and there always had been. The Nazis weren't the first. I mean, that's an old human tradition, at least tribal human tradition. When you really get into your own tribe or your own race or whatever, and you really get into that and define that as the good and everybody else is the bad, a lot of people think that's an aseciation. There are a lot of groups around the country of various races and creeds, et cetera, et cetera, that think they've got initiation down. What they've got is pseudo initiation. It's not even a real good tribal initiation. In other words, we've got this stuff in our wiring The self, you'll point it out, the self is always trying to integrate.

[00:37:07.580] - Speaker 1
Of course, if you don't have anybody to help you with it, you can really lurch around a lot. For the most part, I like to say to groups of men, If you're struggling with your pathological grandiosity and you're having a real hard time with it, No. Get out of the fantasy that it's all your fault. It's not all your fault. If our culture was handling this stuff better, we would be teaching boys and girls Young men and young men and young women, about what that grandiosity in their psyche is for. We would be teaching them what that is to be used for. We would be helping them to contain it.

[00:38:00.210] - Speaker 2
If you were like so many of us, you didn't have a whole lot of help with that.

[00:38:05.540] - Speaker 1
Now, when you really start feeling good about yourself, you really start glowing, oh, my God, I'm manic.

[00:38:13.900] - Speaker 2
I better get some medication.

[00:38:18.670] - Speaker 1
Right on the lithium. Well, the thing is, what this stuff about initiation, we ought to understand about this initiation stuff is that when you really start getting really empowered in all these circuits, you are going to glow. You are going to be empowered. There will be people that will accuse you of being a manakee when in fact, you're not. Others.

[00:38:48.640] - Speaker 2
She says she's interested in confrontation a magician with evil.

[00:38:52.110] - Speaker 1
This is something that's very hard for moderns. Moderns, we like to label things with the nice little labels that they clean up, paint up, and fix up things. It used to be understood as being evil. Today, if your life is being destroyed by some really destructive possession state by some archetypal content, you'll get a nice little diagnostic label. It doesn't sound like a big deal. There's a pill to go with it, and we have the fantasy that it takes care of it. In the premodern period, as you read in this book, Healing and Restoring, they really had a sense about destructiveness, and that it is not something we ought to be assuming as normal. Today, it's like we've figured out that all of this destructiveness on the planet is because of all of our bodies are biochemically functioning. Think about that one now. I want you to think about that with your magician, your bullshit indicator. I want you to get it going on that. All of this planetary problem is because we are biochemically screwed up. Well, that's a great one. The pharmaceutical companies are going to love this. They are certain people in the mental health direction.

[00:40:49.040] - Speaker 1
But the point of it is you really do need to study the history and phenomenology of evil as humans have experienced it. There's a lot of wisdom to be gleaned from studying all these tribal narratives about evil. Once you start studying evil cross-culturally, if you come out of a Christian background and you think you've gotten sophisticated because now you don't believe that there's any reality behind the myth of Satan, then maybe you ought to study Buddhism, or you ought to study Hinduism, or you ought to study Shamanism or something and start doing a cross-cultural analysis of these patterns, because what you will notice is the same thing that Jung noticed. You will notice that there's a lot of commonality among humans in what they understand as evil. What you will also notice is it tends to look a lot like what we call infantile grandiosity today. That is a a bogus God claim on the part of humans.

[00:41:59.400] - Speaker 2
Whenever you When you get human beings dominated by archaic infantile grandiosity, they are going to act out in ways that destroy themselves and others.

[00:42:17.130] - Speaker 1
If you look at these old mythical treatments, they all talk about this. I've got a lot of discussion of that in these tapes on the psychology of Satan in which I'm looking at the dynamics of the archetypal shadow. You might want to listen to those. Yes, one more, and we got to stop for a night.

[00:42:42.900] - Speaker 2
That's sneaky, you hear that?

[00:42:44.990] - Speaker 1
Let me repeat it for the take. Am I saying that the source of evil is within the human psyche? Well, speaking as a psychologist, I would say yes. One of the things I like to do is to lay out the way in which if you study comparative psychoanalytic theory, Freudian, Adlerian, Kohutian, self-psychology, and Jungian, they all point to pathological grandiosity as behind psychopathology. Now, when we start talking evil, you move into the sphere of metaphysics, at least, and mythology properly. I don't mind speaking myth, but we should be clear when I'm speaking myth, when I'm speaking metaphysics, and when I'm speaking psychology. When you're speaking metaphysics, you've got to deal with a philosophical analysis of all these issues and not take refuge in a certain discipline like psychology. I'm a white headian. I I don't have any problem talking about ontology of evil. I sure love to speak myth. I think if you don't speak myth about evil, you miss it. You miss the power of the human experience of it. That's a very complicated business. But I would just stick to my guns that if you don't know the mythology of evil, it's going to be real hard for you to even see it in its reality and human experience.

[00:44:33.630] - Speaker 1
If you study it cross-culturally, you won't be lost in some tribal story trapped in it, but you will be able to get to something out of these human stories about evil. You start with Franz Franz's book, Shadow and Evil and Fairytales. It's a good place to start. Yeah, one more and we got to stop. Yeah, there's questions about whether fairytales are useful for our children and others in terms of getting at these issues. Of course, Jungians are very biased about this. Jungians believe that just as in myths and other stories, that fairy tales capture deep, deep truths about human experience. I think it would be true to say that a child who grows up without exposure to a lot of stories cross-culturally has been really impoverished. But that's a part of the role of the magician. The ritual order in culture. What do they do with regard to that? They steward the stories. One of the books I meant to mention to you that I want to recommend that you look at during this course is Well, the work of Elie Wiesel, the great Jewish mystic and writer, particularly his book, Souls on Fire, which is about the Hasidic masters.

[00:46:16.600] - Speaker 1
If you read Wiesel's Souls on Fire, you'll get a lot of feel for the maegus, for the mature maegus. You get a real sense for, especially this part, where where what do the Hasidic masters do? They spend a lot of time telling stories. Why? Because they know if you don't steward the stories of the human race, that you impoverish the children, and you make it impossible for human beings to be human. Look at Wizzel about that for next week.

[00:46:56.580] - Speaker 2
You remember, we've been talking about the the different potentials in each of these isotype or configurations, how they interact with each other. We want to be thinking about this tonight in terms of difficulties in personality and in society, which result from an inadequate integration and functioning of this particular power within the psyche. We I also want to look at the mogus in relationship to each of the other archetypal configurations so that you can get a little sense about what the magician needs from the other configurations. But I'd like to begin by talking about the trickster, which is extremely important and is in this The Sector of the psyche. We talked a little bit about that last week, about what the trickster is for, and we anticipate a little bit some of our discussion tonight. But let me just talk a little bit, again, let me remind you what We said about what the trickster aspect in this sector of the psyche is for. Then let's talk a little bit about what happens when it's not doing what That's what it's supposed to be doing. I've put up a few notes here for you. It's the first in the sector of this enchantment.

[00:48:44.590] - Speaker 2
First, let's talk about the enchantment of oneself by the trickster. Then let's talk about the task of the trickster in helping you fool yourself of enchantment based on Particularly on idealizing projections with other people. But let's start off with the trickster itself. We're very instructive for you to spend some time reflecting on people you know that seem to be possessed by the trickster. We can elaborate this more later, but let me just say a few things about how you know when somebody is possessed of this thing. First of all, the trickster's life seems to be dominated by the comic. That is, Everything seems to be a joke for a person that's possessed by the trickster. Depending on how they're feeling, it may be a bad joke. I It's a joke, but it's a joke. In other words, there's nothing really that deserves being taken seriously. A lot of people that have this type of thing If they're real creative and exhibitionistic, they'll become stand-up comics, or they'll have a lot of fantasies about becoming stand-up comics.

[00:50:25.670] - Speaker 1
.

[00:50:30.540] - Speaker 2
You know what this thing does when you see somebody that is really into this thing, and a lot of the stand-up comics are. If you want to study this one, just get you some of those videos of really hot stand-up comics and watch how their mind works. Because we talked a little bit, I'm always having some fun with deconstructionism. Well, they deconstruct everything. If you're stupid enough to say anything or make any noise in their performance, they'll deconstruct you right there. But the interesting thing about a man, and you can apply this to women that have some of this, but this is something you see a lot in men. A person that is possessed I'm asked by this very low form when it's a developmental issue, a low form of the functioning of this magician side of the psyche, is that the trickster deconstructs their self-esteem. This thing first. This thing is a double-edged sword, and when you draw it to cut somebody else, it gets you as you draw it back. So One of the things you notice in persons that compulsively are into the comic is their self-esteem is usually very low if you look closely.

[00:52:12.950] - Speaker 2
They are unable to take themselves seriously. When you see this thing, you're seeing a psychic function which is on automatic pilot. It is working, but it's not working on behalf of the adaptation of this individual unless they're so good they can get to be a successful stand-up coming. But now, what is this thing really for? We said a little bit about that last week. It was to help you get through grandiosity in all these forms, to see through to break through it, to not be too impressed by it. The problem is that when this thing is compulsively constellated in an individual, it constantly focuses on deconstructing their personality wealthy, and they cannot really begin to build their world. They can laugh. They laugh at themselves so much that they think that they themselves are a great joke. This is where people will often say, Well, there's always behind a comic, a comedian, you'll always see depression. This is what people are sensing. This is a form of the pathology of the magician, which you see fairly often. It's really something you see in terms of a person's own deconstruction their own sense of self and self-esteem.

[00:54:05.640] - Speaker 2
This particular pattern, though, is not as common as a multifunction that comes out in a reverse way. That is to say, we talked a little bit about the importance of the magician archetype expressed in this trickster form in helping you to break through in orderment idealization of other people. Now, this is one I think we should spend a little bit more time on tonight. Because it's much more common to see this particular form operating than the man who is possessed by the trickster. We said that this is the way This is what is going on in a person who gives away their power through idealizing transferences or projections. This can occur in any sector of the psyche, you see. I mean, you can be giving away your warrior power to somebody. You can be giving away your king power. You can be giving away your lover power. It's not just a matter of giving away your midmigus. One of the things that with the magician side of one's psyche is not functioning, one will not even know where one is feeling really weak because the capacity for reflection is not functioning. In psychoanalytic terms, we would say one's observing ego is not in place.

[00:56:00.930] - Speaker 2
One's reality ego is not monitoring. So one doesn't even say, Oh, I'm feeling really weak in this part of my psyche. So one doesn't notice it, much less say, I wonder who I'm giving this to. When you have a malfunction of this particular disenchantment aspect of the psyche, it's really it is deconstructing you, but it's not helping you see where you are splitting your personality and experiencing your true self only in other people. Maria Louise von Fohns has got a book. It didn't. I don't think it has been very widely known, but her book, Projection and Recollection in Jungian Psychology, is an important book for you to look at in this, to just try to to get a sense of the importance of reflecting on where one's sense of weakness is and then beginning to try to locate where that energy is going. Very often it is going into an idealizing projection in one or more of these sectors of the psyche. You spoke of pathology in the magician, in this sense. It cannot pick up. It is not scanning for and picking up on the leakage of one's power. Now, This next point that's important for us to talk about literalism in the cycle as a pathology of the magician is one that's enormously important.

[00:58:17.800] - Speaker 2
It's one that James Hillman has talked about a lot. What I'd like to emphasize tonight is that it is an issue which is responsible for a lot of both personal and social pathology, literalism. See, this disenchantment, this potential to appropriately disenchantment enchant, to see through as human, we put it, is a tremendously important aspect of the functioning of the psyche. Without it, you tend to over-centrify everything. It's interesting also, you tend to exaggerate things. Exaggeration is a form of literalism. One of the things that I spend a lot of time doing is studying psychopathology, comparative systems of psychopathology. One of the things you notice when you study psychopathology is that in almost every form of psychopathology, there is a literalism, a exaggeration. Usually, when you look at symptoms, they're usually based on some truth. They're not totally wrong. Your symptom is usually telling some truth. Most of your misapprehensions and misconstruals in life are partially right. The problem is that when the magician is not working very well, we tend to exaggerate the little piece of truth that the symptom has, or exaggerate the little piece of truth that the distorted perception has. Let me take for a minute Just to give an example, paranoia.

[01:00:36.440] - Speaker 2
It strikes me a lot when I look at paranoid experiences that people have. You know that scanning that a paranoid personality has, that vigilance, that hypervigilance that they have, that seeing enemies where they're not necessarily necessarily. That's usually what's going on with a person who has not gotten a sufficient integration of their warrior energy so that they can do a better job of assessing the situation and the terrain, picking out the enemies, for example. But notice what's happening. There There's a certain truth in that perception that, Well, I need to be more vigilant. There's a certain truth in the perception. There may be enemies out here. But the functioning of the capacity for subtlety in perception, we'll later give you the big word, the big word for this, which is hermeneutics.

[01:02:00.570] - Speaker 1
That's a big word in these days.

[01:02:03.280] - Speaker 2
But that just means the capacity for interpretation. The hermeneutics has to do with interpretation. The magician in the psyche is the aspect of the psyche which has to do with accurate, subtle, adequate interpretation. When it's not working, say you're trying to Now, you're trying to function adequately as a warrior, you're going to know some things are going on that you need to attend to, and you probably know you need to fight, but you won't be able to figure out just what or who or what it's going to take or where you should attack. There's a a oversimplification when the magus is not doing its part. It's oversimplifying, it exaggerates, it distorts. It tends to be very one-sided. Your perception and conclusions tend to be very one-sided and unmoved. Here again, the psychoanalytic fearest will often talk about the blanket word ego strength.

[01:03:25.230] - Speaker 1
Why they knew that?

[01:03:27.960] - Speaker 2
Well, ego strength One mark of it is when your perception is capable of subtlety and nuance and flexibility. When you're looking at it archetypically, that capacity for perception in a way that is adequate to the complexity of the situation you're in is this particular magician function. Now, you can see that if we had time, we'd go into a lot more of the different personality disorders and so on and show how there's some truth in that disorder, but it's over generalized. But we got to say a word just before moving on about literalization in terms of social pathology, too. Here Again, James Hillman has done pioneering work on this. Just the capacity to see through our various fundamentalisms and our various literalisms. The planet is be set by fundamentalisms of all kinds in which different groups choose a particular tribal myth or a particular racial myth and literalize it, take it as the sum total of insight needed for human existence, and then demonize everyone else that is not willing to give a totalistic commitment to that particular tribal or racist myth. It's been a big project recently at the University of Chicago, trying to do a cross-cultural study of these various fundamentalisms around the planet.

[01:05:39.260] - Speaker 2
It's a very frightening thing that unless trends change, we're going to see more of this, not less, because as the planet continues to shrink, for all practical purposes, in terms of communications and global technology, technological advances. As we continue to denude the Earth and to squander its resources, people for whom the magician does not function very well will tend to take refuge in simple answers to complex questions. Now, you saw this in in the second World War Germany. If you are starving in terrible economic stagnation, having enormous shame experiences because of the Versailles Treaty, then the Jews become a very promising solution to your conceptual problem. You see that? That is to say that the scapegoating phenomenon is a function, is an example of what happens when the magician is not functioning well. We talked a little bit about that bumper sticker, Shit Happens, as being the lowest functioning of the magician. Well, just one cut up from that is, I don't know what the motto would be, but it has something about blame it on the Jews, or blind it on the Blacks, or blame it on us, political party. We're getting more capable of saying, Blaming on the other gender, whatever.

[01:07:56.170] - Speaker 2
But just one cut up from that shit happens is scapegoat. Let's find this scapegoat who is responsible for this situation. Human beings have made this into a fine art throughout history. It's either the Arminions or it's the Turks, or it's the Arabs, or it's the Arabs or the Jews. If you had time, you could go into an enormous, horrible litany of human history based on this. The reason a lot of people don't like to study history is because if you study history, it tends to blast your denial capacities. If you start studying history, then the denial capacity to just deny what actually goes on in human life is challenged. This whole capacity to oversimplify, to exaggerate, to come up with simple answers to complex problems is an example of a malfunction in a maus. You can see how this is happening on the planet. As I say, I'm very concerned about the probability that we're going to see a lot more tendency to take refuge in this. We should talk a little bit tonight about how this issue, how this manifestsends itself in what I call tribal spirituality. Religion has tended to be a part of the problems of the human race, not so much a part of the solution of the problem of the human race.

[01:09:56.090] - Speaker 2
One of the tasks of this maegus aspect The fact of the psyche is to be able to get through that. See, that really should not be the case. The maegus is the one who should be able to see through literalisms and oversimplifications, to come up with assessments of a situation which are adequate to the situation, and to be able to, by that liberation from from simplification, oversimplification and exaggeration, to be able to then try to help in articulating some healing vision, some creative vision for the person or the culture. Next week, I want to say a little bit about Joseph Campbell in this context, persons like Joseph Campbell. We'll be talking about resources for healing the magician function in the psyche and in our contemporary social context. But the capacity to get beyond tribal visions and to get beyond tribal spiritualities is one aspect of this. But this week, we should just point to tribalism in religion as one manifestation on a social level of the pathology of a magician. Of them. That is, when you see Jews, Christians, and Muslims, for example, ready to kill each other over differing interpretations of what the name of the true king is.

[01:11:55.710] - Speaker 2
Something to reflect on. Some work on the magician needs to happen there. Yes, back here. The comment was that it seems that when we were talking about the role of ritual in relationship to the magician archetype, and his comment is that you often see a lot more ritualization in the shadow forms of this archetype or the pathology of this archetype than you do in other ways. I think that's certainly true. We should When we talk a little bit about ritualization in the encyclopathology. You can almost say that whenever you're not adequately ritualizing in your in your life, and when you're not adequately participating in ritual forms in your life to give you strength and empowerment and community, et cetera, et cetera, that you're going to find, you're going to They consciously get involved in other rituals which won't be conscious, but they will be rituals just the same. There will be, for example, take the obsessive compulsive personality. They are compulsively involved in rituals of all kinds to try to organize and bind their life. It's that ritualization that Freudian psychologists have tended to point to to say that all ritualization is psychopathology. But what they're really seeing is just really what happens to a person when they try to live their life without containment in myth and ritual practice and in some communal involvement in some depth.

[01:13:54.230] - Speaker 2
We talked a little bit about substance abuse in previous classes, but again, you can see substance abuse in this various permutations. Almost every form of addiction is a ritual process. It's a shadowy ritual process, but it's a an attempt to find an effective Eucharist without admitting one's need for it. I see. You could spend a great deal of time talking about ritualization in regressive forms of human behavior and psychopathology, which are the magician operating just in a unconscious way. Yes, Steve. I'm speaking of the Christian Mass when I say Eucharist, just to define it. As we've talked about before, the mass is based on this. You can see, if you look into the mythic structure of the mass, it's an attempt to connect with the life-giving energies of cosmos or world, which are funneled through the king archetype, certainly through the king for male personality, or I think through the, if you say, for the total human self. When you're not finding your way to the sources of and you're feeling impoverished and hungry and feel like the center of yourself is not a center at all, but a a black hole in space, then you're going to ritualize compulsively.

[01:15:48.350] - Speaker 2
You become workaholic or sexaholic or alcoholic or whatever, but it's really a compulsive functioning of the psyche trying to connect with renewing sources within. That's really an important observation. Let me take a few minutes to talk about how you can think about this in terms of grandiosity or inflation in the magician archetype. How do you know when somebody is inflated or is experiencing grandiosity, meterated through this particular archetypal structure?


audo_enhanced_The Magician Within 05.mp3	[00:00:00.360] - Speaker 1
Let me just remind you that I have said that one of the powerful contributions of jungian thought which separates it from some other contemporary self psychologists, is that if you look carefully and look at these four different archetypal configurations in the psyche, you can see that an inflation in the king does not look the same as an inflation in the magician, or an inflation in the warrior, or an inflation in the lover.

[00:00:37.770] - Speaker 1
So let me just give a few examples of this, and then when we have a chance to do some discussion, you can elaborate and offer some of some of the others. But let me just start off first sign of inflation in the magus detachment, psychosocial detachment. Now, if you didn't understand about the way the magician archetype works, you might think that someone who just goes off and stays alone a lot is not. You wouldn't say that's been looked, that doesn't look inflated or grandiose, but if you understand a magician configuration, it is because when you're in this magician configuration, you're really important in your solitude.

[00:01:36.770] - Speaker 1
When I was doing my fieldwork on magic and going around interviewing ritual magicians, I began to realise that there are a lot of practising ritual magicians that spend a great deal of time as solitaries, alone in their little altar, their little magical altar in their apartment or house or whatever, and they conceive themselves often to be doing this tremendously important transformative work on the inner planes. That is to say that if they weren't doing this particular magical ritual and that closet and I walk in closet, well, you know, the universe might start to disintegrate.

[00:02:27.040] - Speaker 1
And I'm not kidding you, there are a lot of people that feel that way, that are actually practising this stuff. But what I want you to get is not just that particular, that's an interesting form of the occult. And if you study the history of magic, you will find that that's not something very rare. There are. There's a long traditions of solitary practise of ritual magic in which that's a major form.

[00:02:47.800] - Speaker 1
But what I want you to get at is this sense of the importance of me and my solitude, and I'm kind of cosmic.

[00:03:00.240] - Speaker 1
And what you got in the form of the occult, and if you study the history of magic, you will find that that's not something very rare. There's a long tradition of solitary practise of ritual magic in which that's a major form. But what I want you to get at is this sense of the importance of me and my solitude.

[00:03:20.370] - Speaker 1
And I'm kind of cosmic.

[00:03:24.570] - Speaker 1
And what you gotta get is, I don't really need you. See, when I'm in there, I'm kind of complete in myself, and I'm doing this important, great work here. It's interesting. I don't really have to do anything much in the outer world, but I'm doing this great work. Yes, I'm feeling very, very full of myself.

[00:03:55.520] - Speaker 1
Yes. What you got to do is to see whether this is balanced in this person's life or not. See, just because you are getting insights into some important scientific theory does not mean you are an initiated male personality. There are a lot of boys that have made scientific breakthroughs, and there are a lot of, for example, I mean, the same type of thing. I mean, you can't assume that because somebody's a great artist that they're grown up, and you study the life of Picasso, for example.

[00:04:34.420] - Speaker 1
So we got to be clear what we're saying, what we're not saying. You may make great breakthroughs in some technical area because you're in inflation in the magus is so great that you don't ever spend any time with anybody. You get it? So there's a story about one of the great process. I'm very interested in process philosophy, you know, Whitehead and his successors, and there's a story about Charles Hardshorn, who was one of the great successors of Whitehead, who took his baby with him to Regenstein library or to the library at the University of Chicago at that time.

[00:05:15.730] - Speaker 1
I don't know if it was when Registein was there, but anyway, he took his baby with him, and he got so involved in the study of the ontological argument for the existence of God, and he was having revelations, you know. Then he went home and left the baby in the library. That's a university of Chicago tale that's told generation to generation.

[00:05:42.910] - Speaker 1
Our charm was brilliant, but you wouldn't say that's too balanced. But anyway, this grandiosity in the moguls, what I want you to get a sense for is this. When you're in that thing, you feel full in that quadrant of the psyche, see? In other words, you tend to feel complete in that quadrant. Now, this is something that is true for all of them, see?

[00:06:13.080] - Speaker 1
I mean, you need to ask yourself, when you think, well, now, when somebody's inflated in the warrior, it's the same type of thing. They feel complete in that mode. They don't feel like they're lacking anything.

[00:06:25.600] - Speaker 1
So you get that kind of detachment. It's very interesting. You get this detachment and you get a depreciation of the importance of action.

[00:06:46.510] - Speaker 1
It's one of the things that would be useful. One of the ways that would be useful to think about this is when the magician, when the person who's in this magician does not acknowledge the other configurations, it is an inflation.

[00:07:10.290] - Speaker 1
And so you can think about it this way. When one is really inflated in this magus, one does detach, one does not need. That's the lover thing. See, when you detach, you don't really value other people or things other than your particular magician endeavour.

[00:07:32.640] - Speaker 1
Not worried about the baby or the wife or relationships. You're just into your knowing. So that is not acknowledging the importance of the lover's side of the psyche, relatedness, involvement, erotic connexion. So, and with regard to this bullying thing, it is the magician, the person that's in the magician does not acknowledge the warrior side, does not acknowledge the importance of doing of action. This is a very common thing in people who are inflated in the magician.

[00:08:14.770] - Speaker 1
And think about your own work in therapy. This is important to understand in the context of cycle therapy, when you're either when you're doing it as a therapist, or when you're in therapy as a client. Because one of the big traps in therapy is to assume that your life will change if you just understand it.

[00:08:39.690] - Speaker 1
And this is, you know, Jun was critical of anybody who thought that a proper analysis simply included genetic, what we call genetic reductive interpretations. You know, you come in and you're telling me how depressed you are and how much uninvolved you are in life. And I listen carefully and I understand and I'm empathic. And then I say, well, of course, this is related to the fact that your mother did not love you, your father did not love you, nobody laughed.

[00:09:20.700] - Speaker 1
So we spend all this time understanding. See how you got this way. Now, how good are you going to feel when I get through this? By the time you get ready to leave my consulting room, you're just going to be ready to fight your weight and wildcats, right? No, boy, now I understand why I feel so bad.

[00:09:45.640] - Speaker 1
Okay, think about that.

[00:09:50.040] - Speaker 1
Think about that. Because, see, it's like, you know, when you're in this magus inflation, or if you're with a therapist, that's in a magus inflation. And a lot of us therapists are saying we love being magus. You know, if it moves, we want to interpret it. See, usually a reductive interpretation that takes less work.

[00:10:11.220] - Speaker 1
See, I don't have to figure out, I don't have to work with you on figuring out what you need to do. That's, that's harder then you, then I got to be scanning the terrain with you, see, so we can focus on the path. It's a lot easier.

[00:10:28.540] - Speaker 1
But, so if you got, if you're, if you're kind of focusing on understanding everything and you got a therapist that's basically interested in reconstructing your past, it would be really easy to spend a long time in therapy without changing. So Jung was very concerned about this. He said, it's very important to have a future orientation in your therapy and analytical work as well as a past orientation. The future orientation requires some reflection about action strategy, cutting your losses.

[00:11:12.890] - Speaker 1
But that's not purely magus energy. I mean, that's where the healer, the shaman, has to start getting into more of a warrior kind of conceptuality. If you notice, if you study shamanism, the shaman is very often involved in some sort of warrior mode.

[00:11:36.270] - Speaker 1
Now what about the lack of acknowledgement of the king mode?

[00:11:47.510] - Speaker 1
We talked about that a little bit last week. Let me just stop there and see if something comes to your mind about that. If you're inflated in the magician and you're not acknowledging this king side of the psyche, then what does that do? He says that if one has got lots of this inflation in the magician and you're not acknowledging the king, then what you will probably have is sociopath. It's a brilliant point.

[00:12:22.190] - Speaker 1
I think it's a really good insight. You've got a number of reasons for that. The sociopath is great at figuring things out, including you, especially your weaknesses. The other thing is, that's always known about sociopaths is they're rule breakers. That is, they do not acknowledge any rule, which is not one they decided.

[00:12:54.130] - Speaker 1
And that is related to the non acknowledgement of Cosmos, see, which is in the king sector. That is a sort of a just order. If you're not acknowledging the king aspect, if you're in the magus and not acknowledging the king, there is no order which you acknowledge is beyond you or limiting you or something that is, that is worthy of your allegiance. So that's an important one.

[00:13:32.230] - Speaker 1
Yes, but here he's raising a question about the, the academic being in the magician mode and about how does that, what does that do with the action orientation of an academic? Well, of course, the tendency is to get into a magus inflation and spend all of your time analysing and critic and being critical of people who act. That's a, you don't want to, you know, go with a stereotype on that. But that is the tendency archetypally. That is to say, that's the press.

[00:14:08.730] - Speaker 1
If you look at this particular structure, it does not pull for action. And so if a person who happens to be a professor, this is where a person has to really do an archetypal analysis of their social role, because whatever social role you're in, there's a certain archetypal pull in it that you have to compensate for. So if you're an academic or a psychotherapist, a psychotherapist has a very similar kind of archetypal pull that is toward detachment, observation, non involvement in things that are beyond the narrow professional niche that they're in. Doesn't mean that they cannot deal with that, but they cannot solve that one. Out of a magician archetype, that is the way the magician is to serve you.

[00:15:04.870] - Speaker 1
There is to, in fact, help you reflect on the balance of one's life. Now, if you're an executive or community organiser or in a much more activist mode, then you have to do the same thing. You've got to reflect. What is it that I will tend to omit? What is it that I will tend to depreciate?

[00:15:32.250] - Speaker 1
What is it that I will tend not to acknowledge? Now, the Negus, when it's functioning right, will help you monitor what it is you're tending to depreciate that you really need. See? Yeah. What you want to do is you want to reflect on what happens when this particular configuration, when one is inflated in and one is not acknowledging each of the different other configurations, how it looks.

[00:16:01.670] - Speaker 1
And you can begin to do that as you think about your own social role, your own life, your own vocation, work, so forth, and you can begin to get a sense for where you need to have the wand pointed. Let me talk a little bit about wines.

[00:16:24.220] - Speaker 1
It's fascinating to just study the symbolism around these different archetypal structures. You know, you think the archetypal symbol often associated with the king is his sector. All these particular masculine images. The sceptre is for the king, the sword for the warrior, the phallus for the lover, and the wand for the magus. Now, when you're studying these different archetypal configuration, it pays in order to fill out your reflection on this, to look at each one of those symbols and to try to look at the way in which human beings throughout the centuries have had mysteries related to each one of those images of masculine power.

[00:17:26.500] - Speaker 1
And so think a little bit about the Wand.

[00:17:31.140] - Speaker 1
The wand captures a great deal about this, about the functioning of the magician. And look at it this way. The wand is that which, when it is touched to a veil of enchantment, breaks the veil of enchantment.

[00:17:57.160] - Speaker 1
But the wand also is that which you know, if you look up reflections, traditional reflections on it channels energy in a particular direction. So when you're wielding the wand, it is a taking of the responsibility for channelling energy, or we would say in psychoanalysis, channelling libido to the place where it needs to go.

[00:18:25.020] - Speaker 1
So when you're looking at the magician archetype, and when you're looking at its functioning properly and it's functioning in its fullness, you don't just stop with the disenchantment. You don't just stop with the capacity of the magus to discern and to understand where the energy flows are and where the depreciations are that need to be turned into affirmations. You have the third function, which is the capacity to channel, to take responsibility for channelling energy into the sectors in which energy is needed for wholeness and for adaptation. This is a very key issue. You can look at it like this.

[00:19:14.520] - Speaker 1
I put up here as a summary in terms of the proper concerns of the magician.

[00:19:21.010] - Speaker 1
We spent a lot of time talking about symbolics and hermeneutics. That is, if you don't have the magician archetype functioning well in the Psyche, you won't have symbols, you will have signs. There's a distinction between symbol and sign that is made by scholars in this. That is to say, a sign is something to which you tend to attach sort of a literal meaning. There's no sense of the symbol opening out into some other wider dimension.

[00:19:55.030] - Speaker 1
When you begin to get past literalism, you begin to understand that symbols are far more than signs, and that, for example, a dream symbol cannot be easily just defined by one simple interpretation, that a symbol always has more meanings than you can give in one simple interpretation. What Paul Lecoeur talks about is the. The fullness of meaning in symbols, the surplus of meaning that exists in symbols. And we talked about the magician really enhancing one's capacity to interpret, that is, to make one's hermeneutics more adequate, more subtle, more nuanced. But it's when you get to the function of the magician archetype in therapeutics or healing, you get this not only liberation, but empowerment.

[00:20:53.390] - Speaker 1
And this is where the power dimension comes in with the wand, the capacity to direct energy, to take conscious responsibility for where the energy in your life is going at any particular time and through what configuration.

[00:21:13.270] - Speaker 1
So you can think about it this way. It's not enough just to know where the imbalances are in one's personality. If the magician is working out, you will know where the imbalances are.

[00:21:28.890] - Speaker 1
But the next step, which is really sort of the coming online of the shaman within, is then the capacity to assume responsibility for empowering those aspects of the psyche which have been heretofore left out, not valued, put in the shadow of those spaces which one is not allowed to enter. So it is this particular dimension of assuming of the responsibility for empowerment that that is the final development in this particular aspect of the psyche. Here again, this is where the difference between understanding your problems and doing something about your problems. And I would like to say it's not just, this is not just on the personal plane either, because you can see this thing on the social plane as well. I mean, you know, there are people that totally deny the environmental situation on the planet.

[00:22:50.200] - Speaker 1
Just don't think about it. Then there are people who have broken through that denial and they've come to study it and understand it it and have seminars and so forth on it.

[00:23:09.950] - Speaker 1
But when the magus is functioning fully, adequately in the psyche, the magician itself will expose the need to go beyond that and to get into the channelling and direction of energies toward healing and toward action. One of the things that I think it would be useful for you to do, just in playing around with this stuff for yourself, would be to take some paper, draw out your four quadrants as if you were looking down at the top of the pyramid, and again, imagine your four quadrants.

[00:23:58.810] - Speaker 1
And if you got some paper with you, do this about yourself. Now, try to. Try to just kind of fill in where you think your development, your individuation toward the. Toward the apex of the pyramid has moved.

[00:24:18.090] - Speaker 1
See if you're going to get the magician functioning. Well, we'll get into this more next week, but you're going to be able to. The first thing you're going to have to be able to do is to recognise these powers. The magician has to be able to recognise the four different kinds of power or four different kinds of libido. You can think, I like to kind of think about different kinds of libido.

[00:24:41.460] - Speaker 1
It's a little confusing. Talk that way, but try it for a little bit. It's like Paul Young says, that psychic energy is a general psychic energy, and it's mediated through different structures. Structures. When it's coming through the king, it's a king energy.

[00:24:55.450] - Speaker 1
In my book, when it's coming through the warrior. It's a warrior energy. When you're with men and that have these different kinds of energies, they are different kinds of energy. I mean, you can see it, you can feel it. And the first task when you're developing this stuff is just to recognise the energy when you see it, so that you can know what this magician energy is like when you meet it in someone or in yourself and then the others.

[00:25:29.040] - Speaker 1
To be able to feel what this energy is, even if you don't even feel that you got any of it, it's important to just be able to recognise it. In fact, you might even talk about that as the first stage of initiation in any particular aspect. Being able to recognise that energy, know it exists, recognise it.

[00:25:58.080] - Speaker 1
Secondly, to be able to make a contact with it.

[00:26:04.400] - Speaker 1
I'll come back to you. And a lot of the time, the first contact you have with a particular energy, particularly one that's in your. In your shadow, will be in somebody else. You, you will make connexion with that energy in somebody else first. Like, if you're a man that thinks you're kind of stupid, you may not have any sense of your own magician energy, and you're giving away your magus power to all these people that have degrees or degrees in something you don't have it in, right?

[00:26:42.360] - Speaker 1
And if you really depreciate your intellect a lot, that's what's happening. You see this a lot, particularly in men that are not academics and who are not in some profession, the profession as one of the traditional professions, medicine, law, or whatever.

[00:27:06.200] - Speaker 1
In fact, remind me, I mean, to talk a little bit about professionalism and professions and the magician, because we need to get clear that when men begin to get this magician energy more integrated, they will not be exporting all of their authority to the professions.

[00:27:27.820] - Speaker 1
We want to turn over all the responsibility for the education of the children of our planet to educators.

[00:27:43.680] - Speaker 1
Okay? But anyway, you gotta know there is such an energy or power, a lot of the time you won't even be able to recognise it. But you know it exists now. I've told you it exists. You know it exists.

[00:27:58.640] - Speaker 1
You gotta find it to see it in somebody. You connect with it a lot of the time in somebody else first. That's the first real experience of the power or the energy, and this is true of all four of the quadrants.

[00:28:16.480] - Speaker 1
The next stage is to be able to internalise, to begin to find that energy in yourself.

[00:28:25.440] - Speaker 1
And this may be very, at a very primitive level. For example, if you're a man and you, you never really thought about yourself as being smart or really intelligent or really capable intellectually, and you begin to allow yourself to experience being interested in something intellectually.

[00:28:53.740] - Speaker 1
Now that's an initiation scene for a person that's not in an intellectual career or profession to be able to get past this idea that I cannot get turned on intellectually.

[00:29:15.120] - Speaker 1
What has happened to education in America is a progressive detachment from this particular energy in this respect with regard to education. People have got the idea in the United States States that the only reason to get an education is to make money.

[00:29:35.720] - Speaker 1
There are a lot of people, for example, that think that if you're not going to make your living with it, there's no sense in, for example, getting a PhD degree. Very interesting idea. Totally different from a european attitude, you know, in Paris and similar places in Europe, it is understood that it is a good thing to get a doctor's degree, whether or not you're going to make money with it or not.

[00:30:12.340] - Speaker 1
That is, they have not reduced intellectual pursuits to careerism, see, like we have in this country. So this is related to this whole connecting with the energy and realising that when you connect with this magician stuff in yourself, you begin to experience your intellectual curiosity and your desire to know, even if it's not going to result in more money.

[00:30:46.430] - Speaker 1
And then you get those things that we mentioned, I think, last week or time before you start increasingly progressive levels, conscious incompetence, conscious competence, unconscious competence, those roughly parallel to, to apprentice, journeyman and master, with a master level being somebody who's really gotten to the point that their level of integration of an energy on any of these planes has become so natural that it's second nature.

[00:31:48.380] - Speaker 1
And then finally, on all of these planes, and here again, this magician functioning, helps you to raise the question, well, what is this for anyway?

[00:32:03.060] - Speaker 1
So the development of awareness of a particular energy or power in the male psyche, or correlates in the female psyche development of that energy, integrating it, letting oneself make the investments of libido to develop it. And then, but finally, the stewardship issue, which is at a very high level of development in the psyche, when you really get that warrior energy fully developed to the level of unconscious competence, there is still the question, well, what's that for?

[00:32:49.330] - Speaker 1
What is that energy for? How does one steward this energy?

[00:32:54.690] - Speaker 1
And there again, that's the question that leads to action which is not private or personalistic. Now let me, let me. I've just suggested that you think about yourself on this and you can get a little idea about where the weaknesses are in your psyche. And according to what I've been able to discern studying this stuff is that if you can figure out where your major development is and you look across from it, the chances are if there's an imbalance there, that your growth will proceed faster if you attend to the one across from where your major development is, for example.

[00:34:06.140] - Speaker 1
So you have a lot of magician energy and very little king.

[00:34:19.860] - Speaker 1
Rather than starting here, be good to put a lot of energy in here.

[00:34:31.720] - Speaker 1
So you got loads of lover energy. You're struggling with an addiction.

[00:34:42.120] - Speaker 1
Well, you know, what's that old? It's an ill wind. It blows no good. You know, I mean, the thing is, people don't need. The people hate to admit is that people with addictive personalities are shooting up with lover energy.

[00:34:56.160] - Speaker 1
So what do I need to do? Well, they need to work on this warrior dimension, integrating this more, developing this more. Why?

[00:35:07.760] - Speaker 1
Because the person that is dominated by lover energy cannot recognise enemies, even in a bottle. They cannot recognise an enemy in a bottle. They cannot understand that they're killing themselves. Denial, massive denial of the real enemy. When you work on your warrior energy, you get discipline, you get self control, you get a recognition of real enemies and the capacity to take them on, even though it doesn't feel good.

[00:35:49.520] - Speaker 1
By the same token, if you're a man or think about this in a woman too person, that it is loaded with warrior energy, lives in the warrior space all the time. If your magician cranks up, you'll be. Be able to back off and you'll notice it. You'll notice. Okay, well, what am I shading in here?

[00:36:08.970] - Speaker 1
I've got loads of warrior energy. I work all the time. I struggle. My life is a struggle. I get up in the morning, struggle last thing at night, struggle got insomnia because I can't turn it off.

[00:36:29.370] - Speaker 1
I'm constantly struggling, even when I'm trying to sleep.

[00:36:35.120] - Speaker 1
So what do you do? Look at the way in which there's no space in your life for rest. There's no garden in your life. So what you got to do, look across and start putting energy into that place that's getting no energy. See, knowing your imbalances is important.

[00:37:01.170] - Speaker 1
That's a big step. But when you get this magician business cranked up, then the wand starts to work. And when you realise that you've got loads of this warrior energy and you're not taking any time for the lover's side, then you begin to shift energy. I know some of you are already working on that. So some of you that are doing that, what happens if you, if you've got development along one.

[00:37:32.780] - Speaker 1
This is another interesting thing, instability in personalities.

[00:37:43.750] - Speaker 1
Tell me what would be more. What would be the most unstable configurations. Just look at this now and tell me.

[00:37:54.090] - Speaker 1
The emphases in the psyche that would be the most unstable. Structurally, they would be most chaotic.

[00:38:03.490] - Speaker 1
The magician lover. Right. Why would the magician lover be the most chaotic? But look at it again. The places where you get order in your psyche.

[00:38:18.960] - Speaker 1
King and warrior. So if you're organised mostly in the lover Magus, you're going to tend to be a lot more chaotic.

[00:38:35.760] - Speaker 1
Trickster. A lot of trickster energy and a lot of lover energy. A lot of sociopathic folks, a lot of of people who get in trouble with the law. Isn't that so? In other words, if you've got warrior mogus, you're going to not be so unstable.

[00:39:05.850] - Speaker 1
You may be very dangerous to human beings and other living things.

[00:39:14.270] - Speaker 1
Doctor Strangelove. Warrior Magus.

[00:39:22.710] - Speaker 1
King warrior. See, that's going to be a real structured personality, real committed to structuring. All the rest of you not going to have any fun and sure as hell is not going to want you to have any king lover. What's a king lover like?

[00:39:54.160] - Speaker 1
If you got a lot of king energy, you're going to have all this caring. See, combine that with lover energy, you're going. There will be an enhancement of valuing of other people. But look. Look what?

[00:40:08.010] - Speaker 1
You're going to have no boundaries. King doesn't have any boundaries. Why? King doesn't have any boundaries because the world is his body. That's christian myth about the body of Christ.

[00:40:22.010] - Speaker 1
That's just the king myth. It's also the queen myth, but we don't hear much about that, folks. But so the king or queen is always bringing everything together. So there's no boundaries. See, no distinctions in Christ.

[00:40:37.030] - Speaker 1
There is no east or west, no north or south. That's the king talking. The lover doesn't know boundaries either. The lover doesn't know enemies. The lover has no protection.

[00:40:52.460] - Speaker 1
The lover is totally self sacrificial. So if you got a king lover configuration, you're probably going to be a little bit masochistic. You can, you're going to tend to be very self sacrificial to the point of fault if you're up. If you're a king lover and you get into the helping professions, you're probably going to get into burnout.

[00:41:24.830] - Speaker 1
That'll also happen to so someone who is into a king magus development. The only thing about it is that person will have more detachment in personal relationships, there'll be more detachment. There'll still be a lot of burnout.

[00:41:50.280] - Speaker 1
So when you're working on a, you're developing your magician. The first thing you got to do is kind of figure out how you're organised.

[00:41:59.410] - Speaker 1
Borderlines. A lot of the time, people who are borderlines tend to split along one side of the axis. You get a lot of borderlines in that love omegas side.

[00:42:16.610] - Speaker 1
To get yourself real stable, you want to try to get some significant development on at least three sides.

[00:42:28.190] - Speaker 1
And so when you, when you're planning what you're going to work on in your own individuation, it's important to get your magus cranked up so you can figure out where your weakest points are and where you could ostensibly get some structurization by developing the at least the third.

[00:42:57.030] - Speaker 1
So you may want to do that, draw yourself out and kind of think about what you would need to do when you're thinking about this in terms of our work next week, in terms of, well, what would you need to do if you were shaped this way? You know, how would you develop it? So let me stop there and just open it up and have some discussion. The question is about a friend of his that is detaching and going off into meditation and relationship to God.

[00:43:46.810] - Speaker 1
Here's where the question what to do about that? Well, when you have friends that are clearly starting to detach, you need to confront them about this. See, the magus will try to just disappear. When you regress into this magician stuff, you're trying to disappear. You don't want to be seen.

[00:44:07.250] - Speaker 1
And so if you want to bring them back in, you have to go in and engage them. See, that's the last thing the magician wants to do. The magician doesn't want to engage anybody or anything. And see, therapists that are into this thing a lot, they don't want to engage their analysis or their patients. They just want to sit back in detachment and observe them coolly interpreting from a distance.

[00:44:32.360] - Speaker 1
But see, if you're dealing with somebody that tends to detach, that's the last thing you need to deal with. You need to engage them. So you're going away.

[00:44:44.780] - Speaker 1
So you got to reach out, out of some eros.

[00:44:51.900] - Speaker 1
And don't expect, when the person is retreating like that in the magician, don't expect him to like it that you've reached out an arrow because you're confronting. What are you confronting? Well, you're confronting an inflation. You're confronting their grandiosity, that movement, the self psychologists have this great phrase, I really love it, which talks about this. It's a retreat into grandiose isolation.

[00:45:21.430] - Speaker 1
That's what you're doing when you get into this magician, you retreat into grandiose isolation. And so when somebody reaches out for you, it's an insult to your grandiosity because, you know, I don't need you. What are you doing? Reaching out to me, but I'm not saying to myself, I don't need you, I'm just meditating. But when you reach out to me, I will be.

[00:45:47.940] - Speaker 1
I will be offended. Part of me, the grandiose part of me will be offended. Who the hell do you think you are that I would need you? But that's not the human talking, that's the inflated grandiose magician talking.

[00:46:07.190] - Speaker 1
So it's reaching out to connect to someone who in their inflation is not wanting to be connected with. What you gotta get is when you're, when you're in, when you're. When you're inflated in this magician. So your magician is not working when you're inflated in it. That's the interesting thing about it.

[00:46:30.300] - Speaker 1
If you're really possessed by the magician, the magician is not really working for the human being that you are. So the person that's inflated in it does not have any awareness of being arrogant. Well, that's one of the things you really got to get when you're understanding human beings. It is when they are the most inflated and grandiose that they feel the least grandiose. So if you were to come and say something about confronting their grandiosity or something like that, that would not be empathic.

[00:47:05.770] - Speaker 1
What you want to connect with empathically is that human in there.

[00:47:12.090] - Speaker 1
And you got to look past the grandiose isolation to the human that's really hurting and needy. And one has to figure out ways to connect that are not humiliating to them.

[00:47:32.430] - Speaker 1
So it's not an easy thing, particularly because a person that, see, we all regret. Remember the rule, we don't all regress the same way. Depending on the way you're organised on this, when you regress, you will regress into one of the quadrants. And if you tend to regress into the magician quadrant, that means that you, when you start going to not function, when you begin not to function well, you just detach. You just automatically start to detach.

[00:48:07.220] - Speaker 1
That's probably because when you were a child, when the person was a child, when they really started being in a lot of pain, there was, their personal relationships were more painful than they were helpful.

[00:48:23.440] - Speaker 1
There's a thing we talk about in analysis, that. Here's the technical phrase, we confect our higher cognitive functions rather than other people. So you'll notice that some of your friends and maybe some of you, when you get really, really at the end of your rope, you don't turn to other human beings for help. Now just pay attention to this. If, when you really start to deteriorate emotionally, fragment.

[00:48:54.910] - Speaker 1
When you start to fragment, if you do not turn to other people for support, you probably regress into the magician.

[00:49:08.560] - Speaker 1
You'll get another book. You'll go buy another book. If you find yourself going to the bookstores. Right.

[00:49:18.560] - Speaker 1
Sorry, I think I touched the nerve on that one. I'm going to go buy some more books. Okay. I'm really hurting.

[00:49:31.900] - Speaker 1
Yeah. Lyle says, can you talk about the Trickster as the critic? Not the coming, but the critic. I think that's really important. The Trickster.

[00:49:41.270] - Speaker 1
Both. Both in the Trickster's appropriate role in the psyche and the. And the destructive role it's functioning as a critic. What it is for is to, in a measured way, the Trickster is to. To help you expose the places where you're getting grandiose before it does you in.

[00:50:04.200] - Speaker 1
So if the Trickster is working right, you have a sense of humour. This is what people mean when talking about the therapeutic value of humour, the capacity to laugh at yourself. If you can laugh at yourself when you start getting pompous, then the Trickster won't have to trip you up and really embarrass you. But if you can't laugh at yourself, especially when you get successful, if you can't laugh at yourself, then you're really inviting the trickster to cut you off the knees. You know, at the Academy of Awards, when you've been chosen to read one of the envelopes, you know, and you can't even read the envelope, you know, in your beautiful dress or suit or whatever, but when it's.

[00:50:49.770] - Speaker 1
But when it's working right, it's also the purpose of the Trickster really is to see through. I love Hillman's work on this, seeing through. I mean, that's where Jim's work is extremely strong in this importance of seeing through things. And the Trickster will help you see through idealising transcripts so you can take your power back. It'll help you see through bogus authorities.

[00:51:20.000] - Speaker 1
But when the pathology of the trickster comes in, it's when it. It's when your trickster is locked on automatic pilot and you can't get the thing turned off. And so it's seeing through even authentic thing. And that's when you get cynical and nihilistic and you don't believe in anything. You show me a man that doesn't believe in anything and thinks everybody's on the take, et cetera, et cetera.

[00:51:46.840] - Speaker 1
The trickster is on automatic and it's just he can't discern when the thing is overheating.

[00:51:59.500] - Speaker 1
That's a very important thing. If you just. If you didn't do anything else and get a sense about the functioning and malfunctioning of the trickster, then it would be worthwhile. The mature magus. You know, we were talking about that, the christian myth about St Peter and Christ last time, and one of the people in the class pointed out to me after the class, something else I thought I would share with you about that.

[00:52:23.750] - Speaker 1
And if you've seen this last temptation of Christ, you ought to see that movie in relationship to the magician, because you notice that in the christian myth, the king comes to the magician in the form of John the Baptist, too. John the Baptist is the Magus. And when the true king shows up in the myth, what do we see? Well, the magus knows who it is. Aha.

[00:52:59.970] - Speaker 1
There he is. I'm going to submit to him. But now, notice what happens when the true king meets the true magus, because the true king insists on submitting to the true magus. You see that? Now think about that, because that's true archetypally in the psyche.

[00:53:25.620] - Speaker 1
See, the true king will submit to the true magus. That is, it will bow to the function of the magus. And it is only a phoney king who will not bow to the one who embodies wisdom. Is that true for love of warriors? I would think it would be true that he says, is that true for lover and warrior as well?

[00:53:50.150] - Speaker 1
I think it's true all the way around the quadrants, because if you cannot submit to the. To those who authentically carry the other power, then you are inflated.

[00:54:05.340] - Speaker 1
And it's like I said, you know, there are these four powers and each one carries an authentic energy for the total self. And I just think it's marvellous in the myth. And I appreciated the was Foster who mentioned that to me last week. He said, notice the thing with John the Baptist in Christ. And there it is.

[00:54:35.960] - Speaker 1
Both are willing to submit.

[00:54:40.800] - Speaker 1
He's asking about the king energy in the psyche. That is the keying energy in the psyche. You know, I like to emphasise that it's most true that a man is not a king. He connects with the king most clearly. But the king energy is an energy which is centred.

[00:55:03.830] - Speaker 1
It is. Its primary concern is the establishment of cosmos, which is a just order, a just, peaceful order. Shalom. And it is the capacity in a man to offer blessing, the capacity of a man to mentor others is grounded in the king. The capacity of a man to be calm in the face of all the other tempestuous energies of life is grounded in the connexion with the king archetype.

[00:55:46.830] - Speaker 1
You know, in the christian myth, all that stuff about Jesus walking on the water and the storm, that's king energy, because it's the king who, in the midst of all the chaotic energies of life, has calmness, the peace that passes. Understanding is grounded in that king. And a woman, when a woman is maturing, she has to find that in the queen energy.

[00:56:18.180] - Speaker 1
So I elaborate that a great deal on my king tapes, but I mean, it's blessing, sacrifice, cosmos, just order, the whole capacity to this and world. If a man is not in touch with that king thing, he'll never think world. Well, see, he's asking about Plato's philosopher King. Well, see, the philosopher king is someone who, according to this, would integrate wisdom, magus energy. King energy.

[00:57:11.860] - Speaker 1
Do you notice? Plato couldn't span poets. He would exclude the lover.

[00:57:19.660] - Speaker 1
And why would he exclude the lover from the republic? Well, because the lover energy is undomesticated. See, it goes across boundaries. It doesn't honour neat boundaries. It's passionate and ecstatic.

[00:57:38.410] - Speaker 1
And Plato was quite happy to have that excluded. But I don't think, see, I don't think that's a tribute to Plato. I think that's an inadequacy in Plato, Plato's own. His own tendency to be disembodied. Platonic traditions are traditions that are disembodied and devalue the body.

[00:57:58.320] - Speaker 1
And you can see that in the neglect in Plato of the lover energy, the love or power today. I mean, you can go into that a lot, but you can take different religious traditions, different kinds of philosophies, and you can look at them in terms of what they highlight and what they depreciate in these quadrants.

[00:58:24.660] - Speaker 1
Can you imagine George Bush's king? Aren't you glad he's president, not King? Think about it. I mean, if you see the movie Camelot, you know, I mean, sort of the. Sort of the weak king, you know, I mean, now picture the king who has to say, you know, that vision thing.

[00:58:45.400] - Speaker 1
Think about that. You see, when you got king energy, you don't say, you know, that. That vision thing, when you got warrior energy, you don't say that vision thing.

[00:59:06.450] - Speaker 1
So the way I think it's important to think about this is that it's truly, you know, it's accurate to say that if we had people that were more connected with that energy, there would be more. There would be more natural concern for world, for planet. We wouldn't have an Earth day.

[00:59:28.580] - Speaker 1
You get it? Earth day, once every 20 years. See, we wouldn't have an Earth day.

[00:59:38.300] - Speaker 1
The rest of the time, we just think shit happens.

[00:59:46.900] - Speaker 1
I'm serious. And you have to kind of ask yourself, well, what's going on that we have this. Well, we have. Once every 20 years, we break, we decide we will not have denial for one day. It's kind of like, you know, for the heavy four pack a day smoker.

[01:00:01.550] - Speaker 1
Well, we're going to have that day once a year when we don't smoke.

[01:00:08.260] - Speaker 1
Give you a little sense about the importance of this magician energy, I mean, for our situation today. Because if our magician energy was working, we would be able to see through that business of having Earth day. I'm happy that we're having Earth day, but, you know, if the magician in us all was working well, if we didn't have a coronary, you know, if we didn't pass out right immediately after cutting through our massive denial about the situation on the planet, then we might be able to get to the point where we would say, where is the warrior energy?

[01:00:58.300] - Speaker 1
You know, we better get busy. Yeah.

[01:01:04.300] - Speaker 1
He's raising a question about accessing these different energies. And the first thing I think is important to say is that when you get this magician energy online, that's the first thing you realise. The first thing you realise is, aha. If I'm going to be trying to get more libido into the king, I've got to have techniques that really are directed toward that king energy, and I won't use the same techniques that I would use toward the lover energy. And so next week, we're going to go into a lot into how to really crank up your magician, and I'll just say a thing or two about that now.

[01:01:52.850] - Speaker 1
I mean, giving yourself permission to start reading again. You know, there are a lot of us that don't give ourselves permission to read, especially a man that doesn't think he's smart.

[01:02:12.040] - Speaker 1
You know, if he has been convinced by the educators in his life that he's stupid, which is very typical, then he won't think to read.

[01:02:28.320] - Speaker 1
This is one of the wonderful things about this Campbell series that's happened, you know, recently, these Campbell series on public television, because, see, what Joseph Campbell was able to do with Bill Moyer's help was to bring enormous magician insight and energy through the medium of television and videos. And now we have an opportunity to introduce men in general and other and everyone to all this magician energy through Joseph Campbell without them having to pick up a book first.

[01:03:12.600] - Speaker 1
I mean, it's amazing what has happened with this Campbell stuff. I mean, it is opening up this energy. I mean, it's like people are first time discovering all this magician energy. And of course, Campbell's a great one to do that because he's one that was sort of into this lover magician thing here. Do you want to know what Campbell is strong in, or was strong in, is lover energy and magician energy.

[01:03:36.970] - Speaker 1
How can you tell? Well, you listen carefully to what he says on that power of myth series. Loads of lover energy. Loads of magician energy. He can't stand kings and he can't stand warriors, and he doesn't like any religion that has that stuff in it.

[01:03:52.530] - Speaker 1
See, he likes religions that emphasise the magician and love and compassion. And he also lacks erotic tradition. Love tradition. But what the neat thing about that in Campbell was that he, see, the lover always values everything it doesn't want to choose. You know, it's inherently promiscuous, the lover.

[01:04:20.240] - Speaker 1
And so what we get in Joseph Campbell is this wonderful mythic promiscuity. He wants to make love with all the myths of the world and he wants all of you to love all the myths giver. And so, you know what? He's pretty successful. He's getting all these people that, before Joseph Campbell came along, would not give you two cent for most of the myths of the world.

[01:04:44.600] - Speaker 1
And now Campbell is coming in with all his air, Ross. And he says, here, look at this. Isn't this beautiful? And you think, oh, yeah, pretty beautiful. Maybe I'll get the book.

[01:04:57.680] - Speaker 1
Maybe I get the book. So Moyers carries a lot more warrior king energy, see? And so you get this interesting little, you know, Jung's always talking about alchemical fields. You know, where you get these people completing each other in these alchemical spaces? Alchemical fields.

[01:05:16.910] - Speaker 1
That's an interesting insight, see? Cause here you've got Moyers and camel together, and look what they can do together, see? Look what they were able to do together. There was a wonderful energy that developed between them there. And it's been a real gift to the world.

[01:05:32.350] - Speaker 1
We'll follow up on that a lot next week. But see, look, at, look at this vision. Look at the magus. The magus. When the magus is material and functioning well, he will.

[01:05:43.710] - Speaker 1
And Elie Wiesel, in his souls on fire book points this. The magician will never leave people in despair and without a vision.

[01:05:54.780] - Speaker 1
When he is mature and functioning well, he will never leave people detached, isolated, in despair and without a vision. And so what we see in Joseph Campbell is this, omegas before his death, he's trying to inspire us. See, he's trying to say, now look, you got all these stories, all these tribal stories, and, you know, these are all our stories. See, they're all your stories. And if we take all these stories, then we can have a story for the planet.

[01:06:32.700] - Speaker 1
Now, there's a great magus and these people that say that, you know, he wasn't balanced. He wasn't balanced. That's right. But he did a magnificent job for us, and he did turn us on like a true love omegas. He turned us on to this magician energy.

[01:06:56.060] - Speaker 1
He's got people thinking, see? And, you know, we need to follow up on this in terms of our planetary situation.

[01:07:07.920] - Speaker 1
It might be smart to use media like that to educate the human race.

[01:07:17.160] - Speaker 1
Might be smart to see that as a beginning way to do things a little faster than they're going to be done. Otherwise, it's a shame that the fundamentalists of the world are the only ones that figured out how to use media.

[01:07:33.170] - Speaker 1
Yeah. Now just look at this in terms. Look at this. Look at denial. It's a, it's a, it's a fascinating thing in terms of, you can even see denial as perhaps a little bit of a magus inflation resulting from magician inflation, for example.

[01:07:52.380] - Speaker 1
Why do you have to deny the real situation that you're in? Well, if, I'm afraid that if I let myself know how bad the situation is, I'll just die, I'll be overwhelmed. Well, if you got a person that, just think about that a minute. Diagnose that for me. If a person believes that, if they let themselves know how bad the situation is, that they will be overwhelmed, where is their chief weakness?

[01:08:26.130] - Speaker 1
The warrior.

[01:08:29.570] - Speaker 1
So when you get somebody that's in the massive denial, it's really interesting. Think about that. That could be the magus is not working right. Absolutely. It's not working because if the magician was working right, the person would say, hey, this situation is one that calls for warrior energy.

[01:08:49.570] - Speaker 1
But you see, if you're real inflated in this magician business and you don't think you need warriors, see, a person that's real inflated in the magician, they don't need warriors. They think, you know, only, the only good man is a disarmed man.

[01:09:07.040] - Speaker 1
And a lot of people think that way. The only good man is a weak man. Only good man is a disarmed man. The only good man is a disempowered man. Sure, in terms of warrior energy.

[01:09:19.020] - Speaker 1
But the hard fact is that many of these situations we face in the world, not only in your personal life, but in the social world, require turning to the warrior energy. But if you have had that demonised in your home, many men have had their warrior energy crushed by an abusive father.

[01:09:42.860] - Speaker 1
And so if they think they don't have any warrior, you find a lot of men today that don't think they have any warrior. They're totally inadequate on that. If they let themselves know the situation, then they'll just be totally fragmented and overwhelmed. So it's a fascinating thing to look at. But I think denial is always a problem in having an adequate accessing of warrior stuff.

[01:10:11.860] - Speaker 1
Because see, if you then, if you let yourself, if the magician worked properly, if the magician was really working properly, you'd be able to see, you'd be able to get past the denial, you'd be able to interpret, and you'd be able get it to know what power you need, where the libido needs to go, where you point your wand. Okay?

[01:10:41.560] - Speaker 1
But if you think that that whole warrior side doesn't exist, and you think by acknowledging the presence of a dragon, you get eaten by it, that's what you do when you're in this denial thing, you think if you don't admit it's there, it won't eat you.

[01:11:02.320] - Speaker 1
Other comments? Questions. He says, is that similar in alcoholism, you can think about the functioning of the magus and alcoholism. It's not functioning properly there either. Right?

[01:11:14.760] - Speaker 1
Because anytime you get this massive denial, the magician is not functioning properly. But you have to ask yourself, why is it malfunctioning problem?

[01:11:24.280] - Speaker 1
What is it that it does not know? What is it that it cannot access that it would have to be able to access to function properly? So I think that. I think that's right. Anytime you get denial, see, most, most emotional problems have a denial component.

[01:11:46.560] - Speaker 1
And it's very interesting. The denial is usually based on a purposeful, inflated, not knowing about some energy.

[01:11:58.400] - Speaker 1
See, no matter which segment or which quadrant of the psyche you put most of your libido into, if you're putting most of your libido into one sack, one quadrant, that's an inflation.

[01:12:14.080] - Speaker 1
By definition, that would be an inflation. So crank up your magician this week and do your quadrant and, and do an assessment of where the energy has been developed, where it needs to be developed first, and then be thinking about ways of accessing that energy. Because in bud, as he was saying, the magician needs to be able to have a variety of techniques to prescribe a variety of medications, not just one. For the true magician, there's no panacea.

[01:12:57.160] - Speaker 1
So next week we'll look at ways of accessing this magician energy. And I'm going to come in and talk about people I think you ought to read. We'll do a little reading list, but we can also talk about characteristics of magician directing energy in these other, other quadrants. Okay, let me review a little bit with you.

[01:13:34.860] - Speaker 1
Remember, there are a lot of assumptions upon which this work is built. And let me just go over them quickly again with you.

[01:13:44.500] - Speaker 1
This work makes absolutely no sense whatsoever. If you're not with Carl Jung on the existence of an Objective psyche, that is to say, the collective unconscious, if there is no such thing as a collective unconscious, and you make that theoretical judgement, then this stuff is just an exercise and merely an exercise in imagination.

[01:14:08.530] - Speaker 1
The imagination is wonderful, and so you might want to do it anyway. But that is not the point of view that I am propounding.

[01:14:21.260] - Speaker 1
I am suggesting that jungian psychology is more than a fancy approach to literary criticism.

[01:14:30.140] - Speaker 1
That is to say, these structures actually exist in the psyche. And along with Jung, there in fact is a collective unconscious which is structured in contrast to many other schools of thought. And not only is it structured through careful psychoanalytic research in Jung's tradition, you can discern patterns in those structures. And I've pointed out before in other lectures and other courses that Jung's not the only one. There are the structuralists like Levi Strauss.

[01:15:11.380] - Speaker 1
They're the structural linguists like Noam Chomsky and others, other people who are quite clear in their minds that there are these structures that govern things like language acquisition and all sorts of other things. In other words, just as there are structures which account for our having two arms and not four, there are structures that are biological structures that account for the structure of our psyche. That is, say, my position is a biopsychological position. And if you're not familiar with work in this, I suggest that you look at the work of Anthony Stevens, which I value a great deal, particularly starting with this book, archetypes and natural history of the self, and then looking at his other works, particularly in understanding my kind of sociobiological view of the warrior archetype looking at his book, the Roots of War.

[01:16:14.630] - Speaker 1
So Jung saw the archetypal self. Now, there are many archetypes in the psyche. The archetypal self is a psychic blueprint, you might say, for the formation of an adult human personality.

[01:16:35.790] - Speaker 1
There are archetypes all over the place. And of course, if you come out of a platonist tradition, there's a sense in which everything has an eternal object or a form which corresponds to it. But when we're doing scientific psychology, we're not talking about metaphysics, in which you talk about all the forms, et cetera, et cetera. We're talking about fundamental forms that inform the development of human personality. And so when jung focuses in on the archetypal self, it's by no means as vague as a lot of people Would have you believe.

[01:17:12.360] - Speaker 1
That is to say, when Jung talked about the archetypal self, he was talking about an observable structure in the psyche that is observable in its effects. You can see symbols which come off of it in dreams. And you look through his collected works and just look under self. Don't read a bunch of jungians about jungs. Just go directly to the collected works and look under, in the index under self, and you see the enormous, elaborate research that he went into in documenting this phenomenology of the self.

[01:17:50.310] - Speaker 1
And this book, this volume nine two ion, is one of the most important ones, I think.


audo_enhanced_The Magician Within 06.mp3	[00:00:00.000] - Speaker 1
The distinction he makes between the ego and self, therefore, is of critical importance. That is to say, you're not supposed to be the archetypal self. Your ego is supposed to form itself in a manner which is informed by the pattern in the archetypal self. If you just take a look at that, that means to say you got a blueprint. If you look at the structure of your ego, that is your conscious personality, the way you have formed as a person, You will notice balances and imbalances. If you want to try to individuate, which is Jung's term for getting more balanced and more whole as a person, wholeness is not some abstract concept that has no content. To him, it means that you try to balance out some of the one-sidedness in the psyche. There are various kinds of one-sidedness, which he has laid out, particularly in his theory of typology. I have laid out for you, for those of you that came in late and did not see this, if the break, come up and look at this. Jern's fascination with fourfold structures, his fascination with the idea that the self is shaped like a double pyramid.

[00:01:22.800] - Speaker 1
If you had two of these crystal pyramids and you If you put them end-to-end like this, you would have what I would consider to be a wonderful representation of the human self, with one of the pyramids being feminine and one of the pyramids being masculine. Right now, I'm working on a book on the structure of the self, which will elaborate that thing a lot. We're just talking about the masculine self, though. You look at Jung's writing on this, though. He was fascinated by quaternios. He did not come to conclusions other than in his typology about what four sides of a quaternio were. He came down with this four functions, and the in the psyche. I think that the problems that people have had with typology and trying to get a clear sense of the different types and where they overlap and where they don't, I think probably the problem in that is because the four types, as we've got them traditionally, do not really correspond to the four structures in the psyche. I'm working now and trying to work with some research psychologist on working on a test which would test in a similar way to typology test for these different qualities present in these four archetypal structures that we've been talking about in this series of lectures and My work has been, as I understand it, to have decoded what the quaternio is, what are the four aspects of the quaternio.

[00:03:13.970] - Speaker 1
Again, It's my suggestion that these are not just for arbitrarily chosen aspects of the quaternio, that if you look in different cultures cross-culturally, which is the way you study collective unconscious, you find these four structures. If you look carefully, they explain the oppositions which Jung saw in Freud's work and the oppositions which he saw in Adler's work, and that it grounds it solidly in the structure of the self and not in typology of perception. I was recently asked by a men's magazine what master initiation is, and I said, based on this. There are four powers in the psyche, both of males and females, for a tonne of these things. And there are four initiations. I wanted to read you a quote from William Blake on this business. The artists are usually ahead of the scientists on a lot of things. Listen to this quote from the beginning of Blake's Four Zoas, William Blake. Four mighty ones are in every man. A perfect unity. A perfect unity cannot exist but from the Universal Brotherhood of Eden, the Universal Man to whom be glory evermore. Amen. That's a way of speaking about the way the balance of these aspects in the psyche exist in the archetypal self.

[00:05:05.150] - Speaker 1
That's Eden, so to speak, in the other world of the unconscious. They don't exist in that balance out here where we are. I have said that from my point of view, you can talk about the way in which initiation tradition has been talked about in seven stages, and you can understand it like I've put it up here. There are these four powers. The first initiation would be to realise this power exists in you Whether you've made any contact with this power or energy or form of... I like to think about it as a form of libido. In psychoanalysis, it's permitted to talk about different forms of libido. A lot of different schools of thought do that. I But so you can think about these as four different kinds of libido, understanding that Jung viewed that at the root of all libido is one common psychic energy. I think that's right. But mediated through different structures, They take on different aspects, and in human experience, they do not feel the same way at all. In other words, realising that this particular power or form of libido exist in you. Making contact with it is the second, but usually you make contact with this libido and somebody else first.

[00:06:38.450] - Speaker 1
It's not always. Some of you have good contact There are all four of these forms of libido in your personality. If you had good parenting, probably if you had empathic, adequate self-object relationships, you probably have connected with those. But a lot of the time, you connected with it first and another. One of the things, remember, and those of you that have been with me throughout this whole series of lectures and courses, one of the primary ways of accessing a power, any power, not just the magician power, is to admire it in somebody else, consciously to admire it in somebody else. In other words, it's not enough just to have a projection of your energy on that person. That will not help you. Just an unconscious projection will not help you. Disavowing your sexual energy and put it on some sexy friend. Or disavowing your brains and putting it on some smart friend. Or disavowing your wild man's side and putting that on some dangerous friend. That doesn't really help you. But if you say, Hey, my friend so-and-so has got a lot of lever energy. You know what you're doing. You look at them and you try to change.

[00:08:05.600] - Speaker 1
I try to change my envy of you, see, into admiration. I consciously, I don't even have to tell you, really, but I admire this energy in you and I watch you. I watch the way you walk. I watch the way you talk. I watch the way you move. I watch the way you laugh. This is what the old Freudians and developmental doctors talk about as identification. Admiration. But I'm talking about something more conscious. I'm talking about you're looking at somebody and instead of just some unconscious vampireism like we get into so much, not just eating the other person alive, but admiring them. Because whenever you admire someone for a specific purpose, for an energy that they have developed, you're not hurting them, really. Admiration will not hurt the other. Envy hurts. If you're admired, you will know the difference between somebody envying you and somebody admiring you. But anyway, so that's what I'm talking about here in this. You can connect with that, and this person does not even have to be alive. That is to say, you can find persons that carry the power or the form of libido that you lack, that you may not even feel you've got.

[00:09:29.040] - Speaker 1
You can find historical figures. They have any lever energy. Get to know William Blake. Admire him. You won't spend much time with William Blake without feeling the lever energy. Tiger, Tiger, burning bright. You read that poem a few times and you'll feel it in yourself. You will have already made the third initiative. See? Contacting the power in yourself. That's what's wonderful about poetry. But it's not just that. You, by admiring warrior energy in someone else. You see this? One thing you got to get clear about is the lover in you will not want you admiring warrior energy. It will try shame you about this warrior energy. The warrior in you will try to shame you for admiring lover energy, especially at lower levels of development. Because you notice at lower levels of development, it's a long way between these powers. Higher levels of individuation, it doesn't seem to be so far. Then you realise that this power, whichever one we're talking about, has to be developed. That's a real When it starts getting conscious, that is a insult to your grandiosity. As long as one doesn't know about some capacity or some potential that one has, one can deny that one's got it, and therefore, one doesn't have any responsibility for developing it, and one doesn't have to admit how bad you are at it.

[00:11:41.280] - Speaker 1
Think about dancing. As long as you don't know that you can be a dancer, you don't have to take dancing lessons. Did you ever take dancing lessons? Remember that first day? That's what we're talking about here. Conscious incompetence. This is the first night you're in some honky-tunk trying to learn the cotton-eye joke. Some of you have been. Conscious competence. This is when you get real good at this particular form of libido or power, but you're still having to be real thoughtful about it. You're You're a pretty good motorcycle mechanic, but you haven't gotten to Zen and the art of motorcycle maintenance. It hasn't gotten to where it's second nature for you. You see this stuff, as I've said a number of times to you, you see this a lot in the Star Wars series because all that stuff about Luke learning to use the light sword is about this. Unconscious competence is all that business about him being able to use the light sword blindfolded. All that stuff about putting on the blindfold and being able to defend himself with a light sword, that is the stage. They're trying to get him to the stage of unconscious competence.

[00:13:18.970] - Speaker 1
The blindfold simply means you can do this naturally. It's no big deal to you anymore. It's part of who you are. But you remember that in that series of movies, that Dolph Vader has got this. He's got the sixth stage, but he's flunked the seventh stage. The seventh, the high stage is stewardship of a power. That is, what is this power for? That is, what is it to serve? This is true, of course, we think of this as most true of the warrior side of the psyche, but it's true of all of them. That is to say, you probably read in the New York Times this week about this brilliant scientist by the name of Bull, who, few things started going bad in his academic career, and so he became an arms manufacturer. He was recently killed with some pistol shots in the back of his neck at the same time that he was trying to help the Iraqis develop this cannon that will shoot atomic shells 3,000 miles. That is to say, the New York Times article said, We don't know what to say about the morality of somebody that's a brilliant scientist and turns their knowledge to this type of thing, being active in the guns, the armament trade.

[00:15:01.790] - Speaker 1
Well, I hope that after this course together, you understand that being a brilliant scientist doesn't mean a thing with regard to your capacity to morally steward that capacity. Of knowledge. The question of becoming a great magus or magician in some field, you can get through six of these stages. But then the real critical issue then is, what do you do with it? What does this serve? Does this merely serve some company, or is there some higher loyalty of this knowledge? What was the name of that movie recently about the guy that was the scientist, physicist, who discovered and developed the bomb? Remember that? Yeah, it was the movie about Oppenheimer. I can't think of the name of the movie. Yeah, Fat Man and the Little Boy is about this whole dilemma. Thank you. Okay. We talked about the different things that are Institution, initiation will help you do. Disenchantment, that's the bullshit indicator. Discernment, the capacity to recognise evil and to have some understanding of the way that the destructive dynamics are operating in a situation. We talked about the capacity to have the keys to the kingdom, that is to say, to recognise the different aspects of psychic geography, the different planes of the self, where you can live.

[00:16:47.050] - Speaker 1
When you're in these different spaces, how do you know you're in those spaces? How do you know somebody else is in those spaces? But there's not enough just to know those spaces. You You need to have the keys to them. The magician has to have the keys to them. The magician has to then be able to serve as a ritual guide for persons. This is speaking normally, too, in terms of normal development, not just healing. That is to say, how do you help people access these different spaces if they feel that they're locked out of some space? The ritual guide aspect is simply that person who can introduce a man or call it a woman into these different spaces. But finally, there is the task of personal and communal healing, because the fact is that most of us, if not all of us, I keep expecting, maybe I'll leave it open, that we'll run into some individuated person sometime. But I say, most of us have had a lot of trouble with this. We need this this side of the psyche to get to where it really is concerned about healing, healing persons, healing communities, healing the planetary community.

[00:18:10.100] - Speaker 1
That's what we've talked about as the test. Now, what about resourcing that? Well, clearly, one of the major ways that people are resourcing that thing today is through going into personal psychotherapy and personal psychoanalysis. There are a lot of people that use that, and indeed, that is a helpful manner of approaching this. But I don't think it's enough. I think it's useful for those persons that can afford it Many people, as you know, cannot afford this. Perhaps many vast members of the people that need this help the most cannot afford it. It's a good thing that there are many other ways of accessing this magician energy. Just for example, in that first task of the magician, that capacity not to oversimplify. Anytime you're working on your education, you're working on that. We're in the habit of depreciating people that get degrees and things that do not automatically have a job attached. But we need to rethink this. There are wonderful resources all over the place, junior colleges, colleges, universities that do not cost a whole lot of money to attend and which offer tremendous resources for people to broaden the subtlety of their hermeneutics, their approach to interpretation in any field.

[00:20:05.350] - Speaker 1
First thing, you need to give yourself permission to go to school. It sounds funny to say that, but I really want to emphasise that. Give yourself permission to go to school if you want to. If somebody get raises an eyebrow, tell them to go to hell. The point of it is that it's all right for you to go to school. It's all right for you to study something that's not going to bring you in an extra buck, just for that love of it, just because you want to know it. I'm probably going to have to wait till my next incarnation to get to study a lot of the things that I would love to have time to study. It took me until now to get really excited about physics, to really get excited about mathematics. I tell you, I finally have got a little I feel for a while people are all excited about that stuff. Maybe I'll get to it when I'm 70, but if I don't, maybe the next time around, my Buddhist friends tell me. They assure me I'm going to have a next time around. But anyway, I'm really serious about that.

[00:21:23.300] - Speaker 1
There are a lot of people, because they have been wounded in this side of the psyche, they don't really think that school school or college is for them because they've been told they're stupid all their lives. A lot of folks, for example, that have been told they're dyslexic aren't. They never got any sensitive empathic mirroring of their intellectual interest. Everybody decided they were defective intellectually. A lot of the time, that's not the case. In any case, it is important to give yourself permission about continuing your studies. One of the things, in particular on this type of thing we're working on here, many people are not aware that in the last 30 years, there has developed throughout the United States and in many places throughout the world, developed a serial wonderful bevvy of outstanding departments of of religious studies which have comparative mythological studies in them. This is all over the place. I mean, in places you would not believe, they have outstanding... Tuscaloosa, Alabama, University of Alabama. What do they got? One of them, the most outstanding religious studies programmes in the world. If you think they got it in Tuscaloosa, friends, they got it in lots of places.

[00:22:58.420] - Speaker 1
That is to say you can study comparative mythology of many, many different significant traditions. In our cultural context, that's what you need to do. You need to have access to the best that is available in cross-cultural studies, because that's the only way we're ever going to have a planetary consciousness. For example, I'll do a little commercial here for one of our of competitors in a city here. Oasis is having a wonderful programme on the tradition of Joseph Campbell, which is coming up this summer, which we'll have Wendy Dinegar O'Flaherty from University of Chicago and Michael Mead, and others doing work on the tradition of Campbell and comparative mythology. All sorts of resources exist on this, and you need to give yourself permission to use them. The important thing there is, see, a lot of people who have been damaged and wounded in this magician side of the self quickly want to find somebody that's got simple, easy answers to all this magician business. Of course, there are untold numbers of gurus out there who are going to come up to you and tell you that they have been initiated by X tradition of Y religion or culture.

[00:24:42.780] - Speaker 1
Well, I am a 32nd-degree Apache medicine man, and you're just a 7th-degree Hopi medicine man. Forget it. They ask you to all follow me. You get more and more of this stuff now. What we've got to do is by introducing people to comparative studies of these comparative of these different traditions, help everyone to realise that we don't need 32nd second degree X, Y, or Z anymore. That is something that was very appropriate for the tribal world. What we need to do is to learn to steward all these tribal testaments for a planetary human community. When people have tried out their tribal answer to the planetary problems, we need to have a perspective which can appreciate their tradition and their offering and receive their offering without getting caught in that tribal trap. This is the great gift of Joseph Campbell, which gets me to Joseph Campbell's work. If you can't go to school, and you don't really think you would make it in these intensive programmes and stuff, Just start with getting the public broadcasting systems series on the power of myth with Campbell. Start there. Then start working your way deeper and deeper into Joseph Campbell's entire work.

[00:26:33.600] - Speaker 1
It'll take you a while. But by the time you've worked yourself through the Masks of God, the four volumes, Masks of God, and the Hero with a Thousand Faces, and the Power of Myth, and the Transformations of Myth Through Time, and then his book on the Wild Gander, which is a really wonderful set of essays about all this stuff. You will have a good cross-cultural sense of things, and it will be a lot harder to draw you into some narrow tribal trap. That in itself will keep you busy for a while on working on this magician thing. I can't overestimate. See, the reason I think that Campbell's work has made such an enormous impact is because people have intuited that they need this global, planetary, human perspective on our teaching stories. This is something that may sound, for those of you that have not been involved in men's groups before, it may sound like an awfully ambitious undertaking, but Actually, many, many men throughout the country are doing this. It's a very widespread and growing thing. I mean, men that don't consider themselves great scholars, but who are taking responsibility for the stewardship of the human stories.

[00:28:21.360] - Speaker 1
This is a big part of the coming agenda for men, once again, to become stewards of the human stories and to have this loving attitude toward them that Campbell had. Now, there are some other people that I would recommend that you study. It is on your reading list, the B-I-D, the before I Die list. If you're really going to take this mega thing seriously, you're going You're going to get in touch with this inner alchemist. Let's just go whole hog here. Thank you. Buy you the whole collected works of Carl Jung, and don't get it in paperback. Sell those paperback copies that you've got. Get rid of them. Get them and hide back. That'll say to yourself, you're taking yourself seriously as a magus. You get that collected works of Jung, you put them on your shelf. Every Every time you look at that, you're going to say, I take myself seriously enough as a majorian to buy these books. By God, I must be serious about this. That premier, that will do something for your self-esteem in this sector. It will do it. Listen, that's the way that you got to study this self-auditing field experience that the self-psychologist have taught us about.

[00:29:59.210] - Speaker 1
If you Surround yourselves with things that reflect the self that you intend to be. It strengthens you. This is why people have libraries that they have not read. Anybody a day like that? It's okay for you to have books that you have not read, because when you collect that library like that, you're saying something about what you want to develop in yourself on this sector. So go ahead and do it, shamelessly. Now, I'm not through, though. There's this guy by the name of Mertia Eliade, E-L-I-A-D-E. He's the great cataloger of the religious traditions of the world and has written an extensive amount on mythology as well. You want to I'm familiar with Iliadi's work, starting with the sacred and the profane, Cosmos in history, rights and symbols of initiation, and then go after it, after that, because it's a large corpus. The interesting thing about it is if you take Jung, you take Iliadi, you take Campbell, and you immerse yourself in their work, you will have the fundamental grounding in a myth and psychology you need for this cross-cultural human vision. They all have that interest. Iliadi talked about the new humanism. Most people haven't the slightest idea of what he meant by that.

[00:31:52.040] - Speaker 1
What he meant by it was a new attitude on human beings who could value these traditions. It was very similar in some ways. They had a different attitude in a lot of ways from Campbell. They had a similar agenda for people's appreciations. That's a lot of reading. But you can get into this stuff in some depth faster than you think. It all begins to feed. It begins to build. It's not like you're always reinventing the wheel. Once you get some familiarity with these different traditions, you begin to you began to get some sense of the lay of the land. Let me give you a couple of systematic thinkers. You want to always be able to deal with your magus inflation. You don't want to get to where you think you got too much of a grasp of things. You got to always have somebody that you can study to get you back down to ground, get you back down to the earth about whether you got it all figured out or not. Alfred North-Whitehead is someone I recommend to you for that, the greatest philosopher in my mind of our time, still un surpassed, neoclassical metaphors, a process thinker.

[00:33:39.310] - Speaker 1
It's a correlate in philosophy to the new physics and the new biology and to Jung's psychology. If you want to, if you get feeling like you're a little too arrogant, then you just get his Process and Reality book, Whitehead's Process and Reality. Just keep that close by whenever you're having an attack or grandiosity, and just open it up on any page and read the page and this will kill it. Buy that one in hard cover, too. Buy that one in hard cover, too. All these books buy them hard cover if you can. Keep them right there where you have your chair, where you sit to read and do your magician thing. Always have these in view. The other one, that's a philosopher. The other one, if you tend to be religious about things and you want a philosophical theology, is the Collected Works of Paul Tillich, T-I-L-L-I-C-H. It's not enough to have read a few little things of Tillich. If you're going to be an initiated magician, you have to be able to lay out for a friend the entire architect tonic of Tillich's thought. Now, if you can lay out the architect tonic, you're an initiated mogus in the philosophical theology area.

[00:35:09.590] - Speaker 1
If you cannot do anything except just talk about the courage to be or the dynamics of faith or something, then you still got an apprenticeship to do. That's the same type of thing. In terms of this dealing with one's grandiosity, you see, I have a colleague at my school where I teach, a white extraterader, that's a man that's so brilliant that most of us, if we plugged into his brain, ours would fly. It's a wonderful thing to co-teach seminars with him because it's an awful experiment for my grand negrosities. But it's a part of my spirituality. I hope somebody hears this sometimes. But anyway, I'm serious. It is good to choose some thinkers who are systematic thinkers who really, who thought has an architectonic. It's like a mental cathedral. It's a subtle and complicated as shark, cathedral is, architecture. If you just choose, you don't have to have a one. If you choose one, then you can get inside that and you can feel what it's like to get inside that thing. Then you have a real sense about what a mathematician's mind functions like. Whitehead was a mathematician before he was a philosopher. Anyway, you can work on your magician by doing a lot of study and reading, and it really works.

[00:36:45.040] - Speaker 1
Because contrary to a lot of folks, that stuff will open our horizons for you and will introduce you to new worlds. There's There's no question that this Blue Book, Closing an American Mind, is touching some source spots in our educational system and in this whole area that we're talking about. One other thinker, and then I want to turn to active imagination as a technique. The work of Victor Turner, the late cultural anthropologist, is a very important one for any work in this because of the way in which he took rituals so very seriously, ritualization and ritual process. Started with his book, The Ritual Process, and then get that anthology about him called At the Edge of the Bush, which was edited by his wife, Edith. It's wonderful material. If you put that together with these other thinkers, you've got rich resources for studies of ritual, the ritual dimensions of all this. With regard to spirituality and human spirituality, the series I'm editing with Palace Press eventually will have anthologies of the best essays on different spiritual traditions in relationship to Doings thought. The series of volumes that Douglas Gillet and I are doing on these archetypal structures will be coming out, and they can help get you a little mapping of some of these areas.

[00:38:47.800] - Speaker 1
Let me just stop there. Are there any questions about any of these resources that I've mentioned for studies? That's a lot of an agenda, but we're talking about this stuff is individuation. As Jim viewed, it's a lifetime process. He modelled it. He was still working on writing and studying He was doing all this stuff when he died. That's an important entree in itself. But in addition to admiring people, your heroes and heroines of the magician energy, and doing all this systematic study to give you entree into all these different horizons, it's very important to go inward and actually connect with this inner magician figure yourself. The mode of doing that is, chiefly, in my mind, active imagination. As I've told you, this is true, I believe, for all of these particular figures in the psyche. There are a lot of unions that do active imagination. Most of them will do it with dream images, and that is useful and very helpful. But get Robert Johnson's simple and helpful little book called Inner Work. If you haven't got Inner Work by Robert Johnson, get that. Particularly, look at the little a section on how to do active imagination.

[00:40:35.120] - Speaker 1
Then start working on developing a relationship with the inner wise man, the inner shaman in active imagination dialogues. There are many ways to do this. You can write journal dialogues with this person and keep it in a journal. Actually, if you haven't been to one of these journal workshops, that's an excellent technique to use in working on your magician. Prograph journaling workshops. There are a number of them that are held in the city here regularly, and they give you a medium by which you can structure these dialogues and to get in the habit of journaling, which is an important medium to this. As a part of that journaling, you can journal with your inner guru, your inner shaman, your inner magician. The important thing to get at this, this is not like Earth Day, Shaman Day, Magician Day. This is something that needs to be done as a part of your ongoing ritual process of your spirituality, your spiritual practise, your psychological practise. Yes. Oh, I thought you had the end. In other words, it's useful to follow Jean Bowen's suggestions. She talks about going around and talking to different goddesses, having roundtable discussions with the goddesses, having roundtable discussions with the gods within.

[00:42:17.930] - Speaker 1
It's useful to do that with all of these archetypal figures, I think, on a regular basis, and do it regularly enough so that it's not such an extraordinary thing that you have to be spoked about it. I mean, you ought to be able to have a conversation with your inner magician while sitting in some greasy spoon, the Bellden Deli, or some such place, or driving down the drive. I mean, this should not be such a mystified thing that it's out of reach for you. It should be something that you can have conversations with on a regular and ongoing basis. Jung himself did this. If you're not familiar with his memories, dreams, and reflections, then you should read his own autobiographical Reflections where he talks about his own practise service type of thing, and the way in which he dialogued with his own inner wise man on a regular basis throughout most of his life. So The important thing to do is to access this figure and to form an inner relationship. Now, why is that important? Well, because it's like the other aspects. If you don't get that magician transference inside, you're going to either be cut off from it and have it under a repression barrier, a horizontal split, we call it in analysis.

[00:43:56.810] - Speaker 1
You wouldn't even know it's there. Or you're going to be projecting that on somebody else. You're a therapist, and you're going to have for 10 years, you're going to have this real smart therapist, and you're going to be the stupid analyzant. You're going to keep going and Year after year, you keep going. They're still just as smart as they were, and you're still just as dumb as you are. If your therapist does not understand that that image, that a mongo of the a magician needs to be off of them and inside you, then they have no way of resolving this magician to what I call an omegus transference. I call that an idealising magician transference. I really believe that happens a lot in therapy. You get this book by Adolf Jugenbuhl Craig. I can't spell it, but that's his name. Adolf Jugenbuhl Craig, called Power in the Helping Professions. It's a great old book in which he talks about the tendency for healers to project the patient on the archetype of the patient on their client or an Alizand, to have the patient or an Alizand project the healer or the magician, I call it, onto them and just keep it that way.

[00:45:21.860] - Speaker 1
He points out the importance of getting past that archetypal split. If you do active imagination imagination, and you do it regularly, and you're conscious about this, you will be constantly in the process of taking this thing off of the people out there and putting it inside where it belongs. Your lungs, and you will feel empowered, you will feel stronger, you will be amazed, as some of you will be tonight, how much that person knows about you and how inside insightful, what insightful comments they have to say to you. Whenever you're talking to someone who has not done active imagination, they almost always say, Oh, I'm sure I'll just be talking to myself. But after you do it, while you discover that these figures in your unconscious know a lot more than you ever dreamed they would know, and that you do not know what they know. Any questions or comments about that? I'm doing pretty well. Yeah. Lyle is saying that it's important to realise that one mustn't think that this dialogue is going to get established too easily or too quick or be too simple, that you may have a hard time getting started, but that you may then start noticing that you initiate the dialogue, you get answers synchronistically from other places, unexpected places in your life.

[00:47:01.840] - Speaker 1
I think that's essentially what you would say. I want to piggyback on what he's saying there, because it's very important to realise, as you will see tonight, if you stick around, it's very important to realise that you may have a really hard I'm getting started. You may go into the magician study tonight and nobody may come. From my experience in doing this with people around the country, I just have to say to you, you You got to ask yourself why they didn't come. Then you've got to go back a little more humble and go back and go back and keep going back. Now, you know that Zen story about the people coming to have an audience with Vata Dharma, the great master. He kept them sitting in the snow a long time. Finally, after they cut off their arm and sent the arm to him, he finally saw them. There's a little something architectural in that story. That is to say that you have to... This is true of all these figures. When you go into a space trying to connect with them, You have to just keep coming back respectfully. I have not seen many instances in which after repeated coming back and expressing a desire for contact, that the figure does not appear.

[00:48:29.260] - Speaker 1
You may You also get the shadow magician. You've seen a lot of these in the fantasy literature. A lot of science fiction and fantasy literature, you see these images. But if you For you, it's the important thing to do when you're working with these archetypal patterns. Don't complain. If you get the shadow magician, just talk to the shadow magician. Ask them where you've experienced them in the outer world. Ask them how you manifest them in your life right now. Just generally get as much information as you can from the figure, but go back and see if you can find the true sorcerer, the true healer within. You can always tell, as with any of these figures, you'll be able to tell by the energy that you feel coming towards you whether or not they're wishing you well or not. Before we start our process, I'll give you some other instructions about this, but this is probably the most important single technique in working with your... Developing your consciousness of this aspect of your psyche that there is. It's not emphasised enough, but it is a key technique that I recommend in working with all of these.

[00:49:49.900] - Speaker 1
In fact, you might say that the magician side of you is the part of you that's going to help you get good at doing active imagination. Okay. Because if you get good at doing active imagination with these different figures, this will be in effect your capacity to have the keys to the kingdom. See? Because you can move into these spaces, you can do your dialogue and do your listening and then come back at will. Okay? Yes, back here. The question is a very sophisticated question about multiple personalities and brain phenomena in CAT scans and that thing. I don't think there's much doubt that if we got around to it and started doing content analysis of the content of multiple personality disorders, that we would find that they split around some of these archetypal patterns. If that is the case, then there's a sense in which if one is locked in any of these patterns, you will I have some particular pattern coming out of that. But in multiples, see, what you got to look at in multiples, there is no dominant really dominant, what we call reality ego in that personality. There's not very much integration.

[00:51:23.830] - Speaker 1
This is the personality that's very dominated by chaotic elements, a lot of splitting in that personality. From the point of view of the total psyche, what I always think about that is that the king and queen connexion is extremely weak in that psyche. See, there's where the greatest difficulty is, which you can look at the magician problem. Tremendous magician problem in a multiple personality because a lot of those parts of the splinter personalities don't know about the existence of the others. There's massive denial on the part of the subpersonalities of the other personalities. Often you'll find some of the subpersonalities, or what they call altars, which do know about the others or know about some of the others. From the point of view of the magician archetype, you would say that this personality has not managed to get through the denial phase yet. There's massive denial about what where the geography actually is. There's a lot of rooms in that mansion that people living in those different rooms don't know exist. You can do a lot with that, but that would take a long time to really get into that. Any other comments, questions? A question on the stages.

[00:52:51.810] - Speaker 1
I can see why competence has to go through that progression, but I was wondering if stewardship isn't really independent of that in a way. That person ought to be beginning to become a steward even when they're still relatively a bifoon with what they think. Exactly. That is to say, you want the question that something about isn't Stewardship is something that you try to engage as soon as possible. Right, you want to do it as much as you can at any particular level, but it's important to realise that it's hard to even think about stewarding a power that you do not have at your disposal. But one would hope that it would be done at the level of where one is fully aware of this function and then how one uses it, how one offers it, the The full level of offering is something that can come really only after you have some sense about what that potential is about. But I think you're absolutely right. All the developmental theories, especially from Erichson on, emphasise that even a child, a very young child, is stewarding in the best way they know how. I think that's a good point.

[00:54:08.580] - Speaker 1
Okay, let me just Well, unless we're at our break time, let me thank you, all of you, for coming and being with us during this series. If you didn't get to catch the other series, they're all available now through the Young Institute on Tate. They all try to build on each other. I think you'll find an interlocking system of reflection, and you will have an opportunity to read this stuff soon. It's been a pleasure for me. Those of you that have to leave, thank you for coming. It's been a joy for me to work with you in these four weeks. Thanks a lot. Thank you. Thank you.






